Lord Of The Rings - Part 2 - The Two Towers
Chapter 1
The Departure of Boromir
 Aragorn sped on up the hill. Every now and again he bent to the ground. Hobbits
go light, and their footprints are not easy even for a Ranger to read, but not far from
the top a spring crossed the path, and in the wet earth he saw what he was seeking.
 'I read the signs aright,' he said to himself. 'Frodo ran to the hill-top. I wonder what
he saw there? But he returned by the same way, and went down the hill again.'
 Aragorn hesitated. He desired to go to the high seat himself, hoping to see there
something that would guide him in his perplexities; but time was pressing. Suddenly
he leaped forward, and ran to the summit, across the great flag-stones, and up the
steps. Then sitting in the high seat he looked out. But the sun seemed darkened, and
the world dim and remote. He turned from the North back again to North, and saw
nothing save the distant hills, unless it were that far away he could see again a great
bird like an eagle high in the air, descending slowly in wide circles down towards the
earth.
 Even as he gazed his quick ears caught sounds in the woodlands below, on the
west side of the River. He stiffened. There were cries, and among them, to his
horror, he could distinguish the harsh voices of Orcs. Then suddenly with a deepthroated call a great
horn blew, and the blasts of it smote the hills and echoed in the
hollows, rising in a mighty shout above the roaring of the falls.
 'The horn of Boromir!' he cried. 'He is in need!' He sprang down the steps and
away, leaping down the path. 'Alas! An ill fate is on me this day, and all that I do
goes amiss. Where is Sam?'
 As he ran the cries came louder, but fainter now and desperately the horn was
blowing. Fierce and shrill rose the yells of the Orcs, and suddenly the horn-calls
ceased. Aragorn raced down the last slope, but before he could reach the hill's foot,
the sounds died away; and as he turned to the left and ran towards them they
retreated, until at last he could hear them no more. Drawing his bright sword and
crying Elendil! Elendil! he crashed through the trees.
 A mile, maybe, from Parth Galen in a little glade not far from the lake he found
Boromir. He was sitting with his back to a great tree, as if he was resting. But
Aragorn saw that he was pierced with many black-feathered arrows; his sword was
still in his hand, but it was broken near the hilt; his horn cloven in two was at his side.
Many Orcs lay slain, piled all about him and at his feet.
 Aragorn knelt beside him. Boromir opened his eyes and strove to speak. At last
slow words came. 'I tried to take the Ring from Frodo,' he said. 'I am sorry. I have
paid.' His glance strayed to his fallen enemies; twenty at least lay there. 'They have
gone: the Halflings: the Orcs have taken them. I think they are not dead. Orcs bound
them.' He paused and his eyes closed wearily. After a moment he spoke again.
 'Farewell, Aragorn! Go to Minas Tirith and save my people! I have failed.'
 'No!' said Aragorn, taking his hand and kissing his brow. 'You have conquered.
Few have gained such a victory. Be at peace! Minas Tirith shall not fall!'
 Boromir smiled.
 'Which way did they go? Was Frodo there?' said Aragorn.
 But Boromir did not speak again.
 'Alas!' said Aragorn. 'Thus passes the heir of Denethor, Lord of the Tower of
Guard! This is a bitter end. Now the Company is all in ruin. It is I that have failed.
Vain was Gandalf's trust in me. What shall I do now? Boromir has laid it on me to go
to Minas Tirith, and my heart desires it; but where are the Ring and the Bearer? How
 3
shall I find them and save the Quest from disaster?'
 He knelt for a while, bent with weeping, still clasping Boromir's hand. So it was that
Legolas and Gimli found him. They came from the western slopes of the hill, silently,
creeping through the trees as if they were hunting. Gimli had his axe in hand, and
Legolas his long knife: all his arrows were spent. When they came into the glade
they halted in amazement; and then they stood a moment with heads bowed in grief,
for it seemed to them plain what had happened.
 'Alas!' said Legolas, coming to Aragorn's side. 'We have hunted and slain many
Orcs in the woods, but we should have been of more use here. We came when we
heard the horn – but too late, it seems. I fear you have taken deadly hurt.'
 'Boromir is dead,' said Aragorn. 'I am unscathed, for I was not here with him. He
fell defending the hobbits, while I was away upon the hill.'
 'The hobbits!' cried Gimli 'Where are they then? Where is Frodo?'
 'I do not know,' answered Aragorn wearily. 'Before he died Boromir told me that the
Orcs had bound them; he did not think that they were dead. I sent him to follow
Merry and Pippin; but I did not ask him if Frodo or Sam were with him: not until it was
too late. All that I have done today has gone amiss. What is to be done now?'
 'First we must tend the fallen,' said Legolas. 'We cannot leave him lying like carrion
among these foul Orcs.'
 'But we must be swift,' said Gimli. 'He would not wish us to linger. We must follow
the Orcs, if there is hope that any of our Company are living prisoners.'
 'But we do not know whether the Ring-bearer is with them or not,' said Aragorn.
'Are we to abandon him? Must we not seek him first? An evil choice is now before
us!'
 'Then let us do first what we must do,' said Legolas. 'We have not the time or the
tools to bury our comrade fitly, or to raise a mound over him. A cairn we might build.'
 'The labour would be hard and long: there are no stones that we could use nearer
than the water-side,' said Gimli.
 'Then let us lay him in a boat with his weapons, and the weapons of his
vanquished foes,' said Aragorn. 'We will send him to the Falls of Rauros and give
him to Anduin. The River of Gondor will take care at least that no evil creature
dishonours his bones.'
 Quickly they searched the bodies of the Orcs, gathering their swords and cloven
helms and shields into a heap. 'See!' cried Aragorn. 'Here we find tokens!' He picked
out from the pile of grim weapons two knives, leaf-bladed, damasked in gold and red;
and searching further he found also the sheaths, black, set with small red gems. 'No
orc-tools these!' he said. 'They were borne by the hobbits. Doubtless the Orcs
despoiled them, but feared to keep the knives, knowing them for what they are: work
of Westernesse, wound about with spells for the bane of Mordor. Well, now, if they
still live, our friends are weaponless. I will take these things, hoping against hope, to
give them back.'
 'And I,' said Legolas, 'will take all the arrows that I can find, for my quiver is empty.'
He searched in the pile and on the ground about and found not a few that were
undamaged and longer in the shaft than such arrows as the Orcs were accustomed
to use. He looked at them closely.
 And Aragorn looked on the slain, and he said: 'Here lie many that are not folk of
Mordor. Some are from the North, from the Misty Mountains, if I know anything of
Orcs and their kinds. And here are others strange to me. Their gear is not after the
manner of Orcs at all!'
 There were four goblin-soldiers of greater stature, swart, slant-eyed, with thick legs
 4
and large hands. They were armed with short broad-bladed swords, not with the
curved scimitars usual with Orcs: and they had bows of yew, in length and shape like
the bows of Men. Upon their shields they bore a strange device: a small white hand
in the centre of a black field; on the front of their iron helms was set an S-rune,
wrought of some white metal.
 'I have not seen these tokens before,' said Aragorn. 'What do they mean?'
 'S is for Sauron,' said Gimli. 'That is easy to read.'
 'Nay!' said Legolas. 'Sauron does not use the Elf-runes.'
 'Neither does he use his right name, nor permit it to be spelt or spoken,' said
Aragorn. 'And he does not use white. The Orcs in the service of Barad-dur use the
sign of the Red Eye.' He stood for a moment in thought. 'S is for Saruman, I guess,'
he said at length. 'There is evil afoot in Isengard, and the West is no longer safe. It is
as Gandalf feared: by some means the traitor Saruman has had news of our journey.
It is likely too that he knows of Gandalf's fall. Pursuers from Moria may have escaped
the vigilance of Lorien, or they may have avoided that land and come to Isengard by
other paths. Orcs travel fast. But Saruman has many ways of learning news. Do you
remember the birds?'
 'Well, we have no time to ponder riddles,' said Gimli. 'Let us bear Boromir away!'
 'But after that we must guess the riddles, if we are to choose our course rightly,'
answered Aragorn.
 'Maybe there is no right choice,' said Gimli.
 Taking his axe the Dwarf now cut several branches. These they lashed together
with bowstrings, and spread their cloaks upon the frame. Upon this rough bier they
carried the body of their companion to the shore, together with such trophies of his
last battle as they chose to send forth with him. It was only a short way, yet they
found it no easy task, for Boromir was a man both tall and strong.
 At the water-side Aragorn remained, watching the bier, while Legolas and Gimli
hastened back on foot to Parth Galen. It was a mile or more, and it was some time
before they came back, paddling two boats swiftly along the shore.
 'There is a strange tale to tell!' said Legolas. 'There are only two boats upon the
bank. We could find no trace of the other.'
 'Have Orcs been there?' asked Aragorn.
 'We saw no signs of them,' answered Gimli. 'And Orcs would have taken or
destroyed all the boats, and the baggage as well.'
 'I will look at the ground when we come there,' said Aragorn.
 Now they laid Boromir in the middle of the boat that was to bear him away. The
grey hood and elven-cloak they folded and placed beneath his head. They combed
his long dark hair and arrayed it upon his shoulders. The golden belt of Lorien
gleamed about his waist. His helm they set beside him, and across his lap they laid
the cloven horn and the hilts and shards of his sword; beneath his feet they put the
swords of his enemies. Then fastening the prow to the stern of the other boat, they
drew him out into the water. They rowed sadly along the shore, and turning into the
swift-running channel they passed the green sward of Parth Galen. The steep sides
of Tol Brandir were glowing: it was now mid-afternoon. As they went south the fume
of Rauros rose and shimmered before them, a haze of gold. The rush and thunder of
the falls shook the windless air.
 Sorrowfully they cast loose the funeral boat: there Boromir lay, restful, peaceful,
gliding upon the bosom of the flowing water. The stream took him while they held
their own boat back with their paddles. He floated by them, and slowly his boat
departed, waning to a dark spot against the golden light; and then suddenly it
 5
vanished. Rauros roared on unchanging. The River had taken Boromir son of
Denethor, and he was not seen again in Minas Tirith, standing as he used to stand
upon the White Tower in the morning. But in Gondor in after-days it long was said
that the elven-boat rode the falls and the foaming pool, and bore him down through
Osgiliath, and past the many mouths of Anduin, out into the Great Sea at night under
the stars.
 For a while the three companions remained silent, gazing after him. Then Aragorn
spoke. 'They will look for him from the White Tower,' he said, 'but he will not return
from mountain or from sea.' Then slowly he began to sing:
Through Rohan over fen and field where the long grass grows
The West Wind comes walking, and about the walls it goes.
'What news from the West, O wandering wind, do you bring to me tonight?
Have you seen Boromir the Tall by moon or by starlight?'
'I saw him ride over seven streams, over waters wide and grey;
I saw him walk in empty lands, until he passed away
Into the shadows of the North. I saw him then no more.
The North Wind may have heard the horn of the son of Denethor.'
'O Boromir! From the high walls westward I looked afar,
But you came not from the empty lands where no men are.'
 Then Legolas sang:
From the mouths of the Sea the South Wind flies, from the sandhills and the stones;
The wailing of the gulls it bears, and at the gate it moans.
'What news from the South, O sighing wind, do you bring to me at eve?
Where now is Boromir the Fair? He tarries and I grieve.'
'Ask not of me where he doth dwell – so many bones there lie
On the white shores and the dark shores under the stormy sky;
So many have passed down Anduin to find the flowing Sea.
Ask of the North Wind news of them the North Wind sends to me!'
'O Boromir! Beyond the gate the seaward road runs south,
But you came not with the wailing gulls from the grey sea's mouth.'
 Then Aragorn sang again:
From the Gate of Kings the North Wind rides, and past the roaring falls;
And clear and cold about the tower its loud horn calls.
'What news from the North, O mighty wind, do you bring to me today?
What news of Boromir the Bold? For he is long away.'
'Beneath Amon Hen I heard his cry. There many foes he fought.
His cloven shield, his broken sword, they to the water brought.
His head so proud, his face so fair, his limbs they laid to rest;
And Rauros, golden Rauros-falls, bore him upon its breast.'
'O Boromir! The Tower of Guard shall ever northward gaze
To Rauros, golden Rauros-falls, until the end of days.'
 So they ended. Then they turned their boat and drove it with all the speed they
could against the stream back to Parth Galen.
 'You left the East Wind to me,' said Gimli, 'but I will say naught of it.'
 6
 'That is as it should be,' said Aragorn. 'In Minas Tirith they endure the East Wind,
but they do not ask it for tidings. But now Boromir has taken his road, and we must
make haste to choose our own.'
 He surveyed the green lawn, quickly but thoroughly, stooping often to the earth.
'The Orcs have been on this ground,' he said. 'Otherwise nothing can be made out
for certain. All our footprints are here, crossing and re-crossing. I cannot tell whether
any of the hobbits have come back since the search for Frodo began.' He returned to
the bank, close to where the rill from the spring trickled out into the River. 'There are
some clear prints here,' he said. 'A hobbit waded out into the water and back; but I
cannot say how long ago.'
 'How then do you read this riddle?' asked Gimli.
 Aragorn did not answer at once, but went back to the camping-place and looked at
the baggage. 'Two packs are missing.' he said, 'and one is certainly Sam's: it was
rather large and heavy. This then is the answer: Frodo has gone by boat, and his
servant has gone with him. Frodo must have returned while we were all away. I met
Sam going up the hill and told him to follow me; but plainly he did not do so. He
guessed his master's mind and came back here before Frodo had gone. He did not
find it easy to leave Sam behind!'
 'But why should he leave us behind, and without a word?' said Gimli. 'That was a
strange deed!'
 'And a brave deed,' said Aragorn. 'Sam was right, I think. Frodo did not wish to
lead any friend to death with him in Mordor. But he knew that he must go himself.
Something happened after he left us that overcame his fear and doubt.'
 'Maybe hunting Orcs came on him and he fled,' said Legolas.
 'He fled, certainly,' said Aragorn, 'but not, I think, from Orcs.' What he thought was
the cause of Frodo's sudden resolve and flight Aragorn did not say. The last words of
Boromir he long kept secret.
 'Well, so much at least is now clear,' said Legolas: 'Frodo is no longer on this side
of the River: only he can have taken the boat. And Sam is with him; only he would
have taken his pack.'
 'Our choice then,' said Gimli, 'is either to take the remaining boat and follow Frodo,
or else to follow the Orcs on foot. There is little hope either way. We have already
lost precious hours.'
 'Let me think!' said Aragorn. 'And now may I make a right choice and change the
evil fate of this unhappy day!' He stood silent for a moment. 'I will follow the Orcs,' he
said at last. 'I would have guided Frodo to Mordor and gone with him to the end; but
if I seek him now in the wilderness, I must abandon the captives to torment and
death. My heart speaks clearly at last: the fate of the Bearer is in my hands no
longer. The Company has played its part. Yet we that remain cannot forsake our
companions while we have strength left. Come! We will go now. Leave all that can
be spared behind! We will press on by day and dark!'
 They drew up the last boat and carried it to the trees. They laid beneath it such of
their goods as they did not need and could not carry away. Then they left Parth
Galen. The afternoon was fading as they came back to the glade where Boromir had
fallen. There they picked up the trail of the Orcs. It needed little skill to find.
 'No other folk make such a trampling,' said Legolas. 'It seems their delight to slash
and beat down growing things that are not even in their way.'
 'But they go with a great speed for all that,' said Aragorn, 'and they do not tire. And
later we may have to search for our path in hard bare lands.'
 'Well, after them!' said Gimli. 'Dwarves too can go swiftly, and they do not tire
 7
sooner than Orcs. But it will be a long chase: they have a long start.'
 'Yes,' said Aragorn, 'we shall all need the endurance of Dwarves. But come! With
hope or without hope we will follow the trail of our enemies. And woe to them, if we
prove the swifter! We will make such a chase as shall be accounted a marvel among
the Three Kindreds – Elves, Dwarves, and Men. Forth the Three Hunters!'
 Like a deer he sprang away. Through the trees he sped. On and on he led them,
tireless and swift, now that his mind was at last made up. The woods about the lake
they left behind. Long slopes they climbed, dark, hard-edged against the sky already
red with sunset. Dusk came. They passed away, grey shadows in a stony land.
Chapter 2
The Riders of Rohan
 Dusk deepened. Mist lay behind them among the trees below, and brooded on the
pale margins of the Anduin, but the sky was clear. Stars came out. The waxing moon
was riding in the West, and the shadows of the rocks were black. They had come to
the feet of stony hills, and their pace was slower, for the trail was no longer easy to
follow. Here the highlands of the Emyn Muil ran from North to South in two long
tumbled ridges. The western side of each ridge was steep and difficult, but the
eastward slopes were gentler, furrowed with many gullies and narrow ravines. All
night the three companions scrambled in this bony land, climbing to the crest of the
first and tallest ridge, and down again into the darkness of a deep winding valley on
the other side.
 There in the still cool hour before dawn they rested for a brief space. The moon
had long gone down before them, the stars glittered above them; the first light of day
had not yet come over the dark hills behind. For the moment Aragorn was at a loss:
the orc-trail had descended into the valley, but there it had vanished.
 'Which way would they turn, do you think?' said Legolas. 'Northward to take a
straighter road to Isengard, or Fangorn, if that is their aim as you guess? Or
southward to strike the Entwash?'
 'They will not make for the river, whatever mark they aim at,' said Aragorn. 'And
unless there is much amiss in Rohan and the power of Saruman is greatly increased;
they will take the shortest way that they can find over the fields of the Rohirrim. Let
us search northwards!'
 The dale ran like a stony trough between the ridged hills, and a trickling stream
flowed among the boulders at the bottom. A cliff frowned upon their right; to their left
rose grey slopes, dim and shadowy in the late night. They went on for a mile or more
northwards. Aragorn was searching, bent towards the ground, among the folds and
gullies leading up into the western ridge. Legolas was some way ahead. Suddenly
the Elf gave a cry and the others came running towards him.
 'We have already overtaken some of those that we are hunting,' he said. 'Look!' He
pointed, and they saw that what they had at first taken to be boulders lying at the foot
of the slope were huddled bodies. Five dead Orcs lay there. They had been hewn
with many cruel strokes, and two had been beheaded. The ground was wet with their
dark blood.
 'Here is another riddle!' said Gimli. 'But it needs the light of day and for that we
cannot wait.'
 'Yet however you read it, it seems not unhopeful,' said Legolas. 'Enemies of the
Orcs are likely to be our friends. Do any folk dwell in these hills?'
 'No,' said Aragorn. 'The Rohirrim seldom come here, and it is far from Minas Tirith.
 8
It might be that some company of Men were hunting here for reasons that we do not
know. Yet I think not.'
 'What do you think?' said Gimli.
 'I think that the enemy brought his own enemy with him,' answered Aragorn. 'These
are Northern Orcs from far away. Among the slain are none of the great Orcs with
the strange badges. There was a quarrel, I guess: it is no uncommon thing with
these foul folk. Maybe there was some dispute about the road.'
 'Or about the captives,' said Gimli. 'Let us hope that they, too, did not meet their
end here.'
 Aragorn searched the ground in a wide circle, but no other traces of the fight could
be found. They went on. Already the eastward sky was turning pale; the stars were
fading, and a grey light was slowly growing. A little further north they came to a fold
in which a tiny stream, falling and winding, had cut a stony path down into the valley.
In it some bushes grew, and there were patches of grass upon its sides.
 'At last!' said Aragorn. 'Here are the tracks that we seek! Up this water-channel:
this is the way that the Orcs went after their debate.'
 Swiftly now the pursuers turned and followed the new path. As if fresh from a
night's rest they sprang from stone to stone. At last they reached the crest of the
grey hill, and a sudden breeze blew in their hair and stirred their cloaks: the chill wind
of dawn.
 Turning back they saw across the River the far hills kindled. Day leaped into the
sky. The red rim of the sun rose over the shoulders of the dark land. Before them in
the West the world lay still, formless and grey; but even as they looked, the shadows
of night melted, the colours of the waking earth returned: green flowed over the wide
meads of Rohan; the white mists shimmered in the watervales; and far off to the left,
thirty leagues or more, blue and purple stood the White Mountains, rising into peaks
of jet, tipped with glimmering snows, flushed with the rose of morning.
 'Gondor! Gondor!' cried Aragorn. 'Would that I looked on you again in happier hour!
Not yet does my road lie southward to your bright streams.
Gondor! Gondor, between the Mountains and the Sea!
West Wind blew there; the light upon the Silver Tree
Fell like bright rain in gardens of the Kings of old.
O proud walls! White towers! O winged crown and throne of gold!
O Gondor, Gondor! Shall Men behold the Silver Tree,
Or West Wind blow again between the Mountains and the Sea?
 'Now let us go!' he said, drawing his eyes away from the South, and looking out
west and north to the way that he must tread.
 The ridge upon which the companions stood went down steeply before their feet.
Below it twenty fathoms or more, there was a wide and rugged shelf which ended
suddenly in the brink of a sheer cliff: the East Wall of Rohan. So ended the Emyn
Muil, and the green plains of the Rohirrim stretched away before them to the edge of
sight.
 'Look!' cried Legolas, pointing up into the pale sky above them. 'There is the eagle
again! He is very high. He seems to be flying now away, from this land back to the
North. He is going with great speed. Look!'
 'No, not even my eyes can see him, my good Legolas,' said Aragorn. 'He must be
far aloft indeed. I wonder what is his errand, if he is the same bird that I have seen
before. But look! I can see something nearer at hand and more urgent; there is
 9
something moving over the plain!'
 'Many things,' said Legolas. 'It is a great company on foot; but I cannot say more,
nor see what kind of folk they may be. They are many leagues away: twelve, I guess;
but the flatness of the plain is hard to measure.'
 'I think, nonetheless, that we no longer need any trail to tell us which way to go,'
said Gimli. 'Let us find a path down to the fields as quick as may be.'
 'I doubt if you will find a path quicker than the one that the Orcs chose,' said
Aragorn.
 They followed their enemies now by the clear light of day. It seemed that the Orcs
had pressed on with all possible speed. Every now and again the pursuers found
things that had been dropped or cast away: food-bags, the rinds and crusts of hard
grey bread, a torn black cloak, a heavy iron-nailed shoe broken on the stones. The
trail led them north along the top of the escarpment, and at length they came to a
deep cleft carved in the rock by a stream that splashed noisily down. In the narrow
ravine a rough path descended like a steep stair into the plain.
 At the bottom they came with a strange suddenness on the grass of Rohan. It
swelled like a green sea up to the very foot of the Emyn Muil. The falling stream
vanished into a deep growth of cresses and water-plants, and they could hear it
tinkling away in green tunnels, down long gentle slopes towards the fens of Entwash
Vale far away. They seemed to have left winter clinging to the hills behind. Here the
air was softer and warmer, and faintly scented, as if spring was already stirring and
the sap was flowing again in herb and leaf. Legolas took a deep breath, like one that
drinks a great draught after long thirst in barren places.
 'Ah! the green smell!' he said. 'It is better than much sleep. Let us run!'
 'Light feet may run swiftly here,' said Aragorn. 'More swiftly, maybe, than iron-shod
Orcs. Now we have a chance to lessen their lead!'
 They went in single file, running like hounds on a strong scent, and an eager light
was in their eyes. Nearly due west the broad swath of the marching Orcs tramped its
ugly slot; the sweet grass of Rohan had been bruised and blackened as they
passed. Presently Aragorn gave a cry and turned aside. 'Stay!' he shouted. 'Do not
follow me yet!' He ran quickly to the right, away from the main trail; for he had seen
footprints that went that way, branching off from the others, the marks of small
 10
unshod feet. These, however, did not go far before they were crossed by orc-prints,
also coming out from the main trail behind and in front, and then they curved sharply
back again and were lost in the trampling. At the furthest point Aragorn stooped and
picked up something from the grass; then he ran back.
 'Yes,' he said, 'they are quite plain: a hobbit's footprints. Pippin's I think. He is
smaller than the other. And look at this! He held up a thing that glittered in the
sunlight. It looked like the new-opened leaf of a beech-tree, fair and strange in that
treeless plain.
 'The brooch of an elven-cloak!' cried Legolas and Gimli together.
'Not idly do the leaves of Lorien fall,' said Aragorn. 'This did not drop by chance: it
was cast away as a token to any that might follow. I think Pippin ran away from the
trail for that purpose.'
 'Then he at least was alive,' said Gimli. 'And he had the use of his wits, and of his
legs too. That is heartening. We do not pursue in vain.'
 'Let us hope that he did not pay too dearly for his boldness,' said Legolas. 'Come!
Let us go on! The thought of those merry young folk driven like cattle burns my
heart.'
 The sun climbed to the noon and then rode slowly down the sky. Light clouds
came up out of the sea in the distant South and were blown away upon the breeze.
The sun sank. Shadows rose behind and reached out long arms from the East. Still
the hunters held on. One day now had passed since Boromir fell, and the Orcs were
yet far ahead. No longer could any sight of them be seen in the level plains.
 As nightshade was closing about them Aragorn halted. Only twice in the day's
march had they rested for a brief while, and twelve leagues now lay between them
and the eastern wall where they had stood at dawn.
 'We have come at last to a hard choice,' he said. 'Shall we rest by night, or shall we
go on while our will and strength hold?'
 'Unless our enemies rest also, they will leave us far behind, if we stay to sleep.'
said Legolas.
 'Surely even Orcs must pause on the march?' said Gimli.
 'Seldom will Orcs journey in the open under the sun, yet these have done so,' said
Legolas. 'Certainly they will not rest by night.'
 'But if we walk by night, we cannot follow their trail,' said Gimli.
 'The trail is straight, and turns neither right nor left, as far as my eyes can see,' said
Legolas.
 'Maybe, I could lead you at guess in the darkness and hold to the line,' said
Aragorn, 'but if we strayed, or they turned aside, then when light came there might
be long delay before the trail was found again.'
 'And there is this also,' said Gimli, 'only by day can we see if any tracks lead away.
If a prisoner should escape, or if one should be carried off, eastward, say, to the
Great River, towards Mordor, we might pass the signs and never know it.'
 'That is true,' said Aragorn. 'But if I read the signs back yonder rightly, the Orcs of
the White Hand prevailed, and the whole company is now bound for Isengard. Their
present course bears me out.'
 'Yet it would be rash to be sure of their counsels,' said Gimli. 'And what of escape?
In the dark we should have passed the signs that led you to the brooch.'
 'The Orcs will be doubly on their guard since then, and the prisoners even wearier,'
said Legolas. 'There will be no escape again, if we do not contrive it. How that is to
be done cannot be guessed, but first we must overtake them.'
 'And yet even I, Dwarf of many journeys, and not the least hardy of my folk, cannot
 11
run all the way to Isengard without any pause,' said Gimli. 'My heart burns me too,
and I would have started sooner but now I must rest a little to run the better. And if
we rest, then the blind night is the time to do so.'
 'I said that it was a hard choice,' said Aragorn. 'How shall we end this debate?'
 'You are our guide,' said Gimli, 'and you are skilled in the chase. You shall choose.'
 'My heart bids me go on,' said Legolas. 'But we must hold together. I will follow
your counsel.'
 'You give the choice to an ill chooser,' said Aragorn. 'Since we passed through the
Argonath my choices have gone amiss.' He fell silent gazing north and west into the
gathering night for a long while.
 'We will not walk in the dark,' he said at length. 'The peril of missing the trail or
signs of other coming and going seems to me the greater. If the Moon gave enough
light, we would use it, but alas! he sets early and is yet young and pale.'
 'And tonight he is shrouded anyway,' Gimli murmured. 'Would that the Lady had
given us a light, such a gift as she gave to Frodo!'
 'It will be more needed where it is bestowed,' said Aragorn. 'With him lies the true
Quest. Ours is but a small matter in the great deeds of this time. A vain pursuit from
its beginning, maybe, which no choice of mine can mar or mend. Well, I have
chosen. So let us use the time as best we may!'
 He cast himself on the ground and fell at once into sleep, for he had not slept since
their night under the shadow of Tol Brandir. Before dawn was in the sky he woke and
rose. Gimli was still deep in slumber, but Legolas was standing, gazing northwards
into the darkness, thoughtful and silent as a young tree in a windless night.
 'They are far far away,' he said sadly, turning to Aragorn. 'I know in my heart that
they have not rested this night. Only an eagle could overtake them now.'
 'Nonetheless we will still follow as we may,' said Aragorn. Stooping he roused the
Dwarf. 'Come! We must go,' he said. 'The scent is growing cold.'
 'But it is still dark,' said Gimli. 'Even Legolas on a hill-top could not see them till the
Sun is up.'
 'I fear they have passed beyond my sight from hill or plain, under moon or sun,'
said Legolas.
 'Where sight fails the earth may bring us rumour,' said Aragorn. 'The land must
groan under their hated feet.' He stretched himself upon the ground with his ear
pressed against the turf. He lay there motionless, for so long a time that Gimli
wondered if he had swooned or fallen asleep again. Dawn came glimmering, and
slowly a grey light grew about them. At last he rose, and now his friends could see
his face: it was pale and drawn, and his look was troubled.
 'The rumour of the earth is dim and confused,' he said. 'Nothing walks upon it for
many miles about us. Faint and far are the feet of our enemies. But loud are the
hoofs of the horses. It comes to my mind that I heard them, even as I lay on the
ground in sleep, and they troubled my dreams: horses galloping, passing in the
West. But now they are drawing ever further from us, riding northward. I wonder
what is happening in this land!'
 'Let us go!' said Legolas.
 So the third day of their pursuit began. During all its long hours of cloud and fitful
sun they hardly paused, now striding, now running, as if no weariness could quench
the fire that burned them. They seldom spoke. Over the wide solitude they passed
and their elven-cloaks faded against the background of the grey-green fields; even in
the cool sunlight of mid-day few but elvish eyes would have marked them, until they
were close at hand. Often in their hearts they thanked the Lady of Lorien for the gift
 12
of lembas, for they could eat of it and find new strength even as they ran.
 All day the track of their enemies led straight on, going north-west without a break
or turn. As once again the day wore to its end they came to long treeless slopes,
where the land rose, swelling up towards a line of low humpbacked downs ahead.
The orc-trail grew fainter as it bent north towards them, for the ground became
harder and the grass shorter. Far away to the left the river Entwash wound, a silver
thread in a green floor. No moving thing could be seen. Often Aragorn wondered that
they saw no sign of beast or man. The dwellings of the Rohirrim were for the most
part many leagues away to the South, under the wooded eaves of the White
Mountains, now hidden in mist and cloud; yet the Horse-lords had formerly kept
many herds and studs in the Eastemnet, this easterly region of their realm, and there
the herdsmen had wandered much, living in camp and tent, even in winter-time. But
now all the land was empty, and there was silence that did not seem to be the quiet
of peace.
 At dusk they halted again. Now twice twelve leagues they had passed over the
plains of Rohan and the wall of the Emyn Muil was lost in the shadows of the East.
The young moon was glimmering in a misty sky, but it gave small light, and the stars
were veiled.
 'Now do I most grudge a time of rest or any halt in our chase,' said Legolas. 'The
Orcs have run before us, as if the very whips of Sauron were behind them. I fear
they have already reached the forest and the dark hills, and even now are passing
into the shadows of the trees.'
 Gimli ground his teeth. 'This is a bitter end to our hope and to all our toil!' he said.
 'To hope, maybe, but not to toil,' said Aragorn. 'We shall not turn back here. Yet I
am weary.' He gazed back along the way that they had come towards the night
gathering in the East. 'There is something strange at work in this land. I distrust the
silence. I distrust even the pale Moon. The stars are faint; and I am weary as I have
seldom been before, weary as no Ranger should be with a clear trail to follow. There
is some will that lends speed to our foes and sets an unseen barrier before us: a
weariness that is in the heart more than in the limb.'
 'Truly!' said Legolas. 'That I have known since first we came down from the Emyn
Muil. For the will is not behind us but before us.' He pointed away over the land of
Rohan into the darkling West under the sickle moon.
 'Saruman!' muttered Aragorn. 'But he shall not turn us back! Halt we must once
more; for, see! even the Moon is falling into gathering cloud. But north lies our road
between down and fen when day returns.'
 As before Legolas was first afoot, if indeed he had ever slept. 'Awake! Awake!' he
cried. 'It is a red dawn. Strange things await us by the eaves of the forest. Good or
evil, I do not know; but we are called. Awake!'
 The others sprang up, and almost at once they set off again. Slowly the downs
drew near. It was still an hour before noon when they reached them: green slopes
rising to bare ridges that ran in a line straight towards the North. At their feet the
ground was dry and the turf short, but a long strip of sunken land, some ten miles
wide, lay between them and the river wandering deep in dim thickets of reed and
rush. Just to the West of the southernmost slope there was a great ring, where the
turf had been torn and beaten by many trampling feet. From it the orc-trail ran out
again, turning north along the dry skirts of the hills. Aragorn halted and examined the
tracks closely.
 'They rested here a while,' he said, 'but even the outward trail is already old. I fear
that your heart spoke truly, Legolas: it is thrice twelve hours, I guess, since the Orcs
 13
stood where we now stand. If they held to their pace, then at sundown yesterday
they would reach the borders of Fangorn.'
 'I can see nothing away north or west but grass dwindling into mist,' said Gimli.
'Could we see the forest, if we climbed the hills?'
 'It is still far away,' said Aragorn. 'If I remember rightly, these downs run eight
leagues or more to the north, and then north-west to the issuing of the Entwash there
lies still a wide land, another fifteen leagues it may be.'
 'Well, let us go on,' said Gimli. 'My legs must forget the miles. They would be more
willing, if my heart were less heavy.'
 The sun was sinking when at last they drew near to the end of the line of downs.
For many hours they had marched without rest. They were going slowly now, and
Gimli's back was bent. Stone-hard are the Dwarves in labour or journey, but this
endless chase began to tell on him, as all hope failed in his heart. Aragorn walked
behind him, grim and silent, stooping now and again to scan some print or mark
upon the ground. Only Legolas still stepped as lightly as ever, his feet hardly
seeming to press the grass, leaving no footprints as he passed; but in the waybread
of the Elves he found all the sustenance that he needed, and he could sleep, if sleep
it could be called by Men, resting his mind in the strange paths of elvish dreams,
even as he walked open-eyed in the light of this world.
 'Let us go up on to this green hill!' he said. Wearily they followed him, climbing the
long slope, until they came out upon the top. It was a round hill smooth and bare,
standing by itself, the most northerly of the downs. The sun sank and the shadows of
evening fell like a curtain. They were alone in a grey formless world without mark or
measure. Only far away north-west there was a deeper darkness against the dying
light: the Mountains of Mist and the forest at their feet.
 'Nothing can we see to guide us here,' said Gimli. 'Well, now we must halt again
and wear the night away. It is growing cold!'
 'The wind is north from the snows,' said Aragorn.
 'And ere morning it will be in the East,' said Legolas. 'But rest if you must. Yet do
not cast all hope away. Tomorrow is unknown. Rede oft is found at the rising of the
Sun.'
 'Three suns already have risen on our chase and brought no counsel,' said Gimli.
 The night grew ever colder. Aragorn and Gimli slept fitfully, and whenever they
awoke they saw Legolas standing beside them, or walking to and fro, singing softly
to himself in his own tongue, and as he sang the white stars opened in the hard
black vault above. So the night passed. Together they watched the dawn grow
slowly in the sky, now bare and cloudless, until at last the sunrise came. It was pale
and clear. The wind was in the East and all the mists had rolled away; wide lands lay
bleak about them in the bitter light.
 Ahead and eastward they saw the windy uplands of the Wold of Rohan that they
had already glimpsed many days ago from the Great River. North-westward stalked
the dark forest of Fangorn; still ten leagues away stood its shadowy eaves, and its
further slopes faded into the distant blue. Beyond there glimmered far away, as if
floating on a grey cloud, the white head of tall Methedras, the last peak of the Misty
Mountains. Out of the forest the Entwash flowed to meet them, its stream now swift
and narrow, and its banks deep-cloven. The orc-trail turned from the downs towards
it.
 Following with his keen eyes the trail to the river, and then the river back towards
the forest, Aragorn saw a shadow on the distant green, a dark swift-moving blur. He
cast himself upon the ground and listened again intently. But Legolas stood beside
 14
him, shading his bright elven-eyes with his long slender hand, and he saw not a
shadow, nor a blur, but the small figures of horsemen, many horsemen, and the glint
of morning on the tips of their spears was like the twinkle of minute stars beyond the
edge of mortal sight. Far behind them a dark smoke rose in thin curling threads.
 There was a silence in the empty fields, arid Gimli could hear the air moving in the
grass.
 'Riders!' cried Aragorn, springing to his feet. 'Many riders on swift steeds are
coming towards us!'
 'Yes,' said Legolas, 'there are one hundred and five. Yellow is their hair, and bright
are their spears. Their leader is very tall.'
 Aragorn smiled. 'Keen are the eyes of the Elves,' he said.
 'Nay! The riders are little more than five leagues distant,' said Legolas.
 'Five leagues or one,' said Gimli; 'we cannot escape them in this bare land. Shall
we wait for them here or go on our way?'
 'We will wait,' said Aragorn. 'I am weary, and our hunt has failed. Or at least others
were before us; for these horsemen are riding back down the orc-trail. We may get
news from them.'
 'Or spears,' said Gimli.
 'There are three empty saddles, but I see no hobbits,' said Legolas.
 'I did not say that we should hear good news,' said Aragorn. 'But evil or good we
will await it here.'
 The three companions now left the hill-top, where they might be an easy mark
against the pale sky, and they walked slowly down the northward slope. A little
above the hill's foot they halted, and wrapping their cloaks about them, they sat
huddled together upon the faded grass. The time passed slowly and heavily. The
wind was thin and searching. Gimli was uneasy.
 'What do you know of these horsemen, Aragorn?' he said. 'Do we sit here waiting
for sudden death?'
 'I have been among them,' answered Aragorn. 'They are proud and wilful, but they
are true-hearted, generous in thought and deed; bold but not cruel; wise but
unlearned, writing no books but singing many songs, after the manner of the children
of Men before the Dark Years. But I do not know what has happened here of late,
nor in what mind the Rohirrim may now be between the traitor Saruman and the
threat of Sauron. They have long been the friends of the people of Gondor, though
they are not akin to them. It was in forgotten years long ago that Eorl the Young
brought them out of the North, and their kinship is rather with the Bardings of Dale,
and with the Beornings of the Wood, among whom may still be seen many men tall
and fair, as are the Riders of Rohan. At least they will not love the Orcs.'
 'But Gandalf spoke of a rumour that they pay tribute to Mordor,' said Gimli.
 'I believe it no more than did Boromir,' answered Aragorn.
 'You will soon learn the truth,' said Legolas. 'Already they approach.'
 At length even Gimli could hear the distant beat of galloping hoofs. The horsemen,
following the trail, had turned from the river, and were drawing near the downs. They
were riding like the wind.
 Now the cries of clear strong voices came ringing over the fields. Suddenly they
swept up with a noise like thunder, and the foremost horseman swerved, passing by
the foot of the hill, and leading the host back southward along the western skirts of
the downs. After him they rode: a long line of mail-clad men, swift, shining, fell and
fair to look upon.
 Their horses were of great stature, strong and clean-limbed; their grey coats
 15
glistened, their long tails flowed in the wind, their manes were braided on their proud
necks. The Men that rode them matched them well: tall and long-limbed; their hair,
flaxen-pale, flowed under their light helms, and streamed in long braids behind them;
their faces were stern and keen. In their hands were tall spears of ash, painted
shields were slung at their backs, long swords were at their belts, their burnished
skirts of mail hung down upon their knees.
 In pairs they galloped by, and though every now and then one rose in his stirrups
and gazed ahead and to either side, they appeared not to perceive the three
strangers sitting silently and watching them. The host had almost passed when
suddenly Aragorn stood up, and called in a loud voice:
 'What news from the North, Riders of Rohan?'
 With astonishing speed and skill they checked their steeds, wheeled, and came
charging round. Soon the three companions found themselves in a ring of horsemen
moving in a running circle, up the hill-slope behind them and down, round and round
them, and drawing ever inwards. Aragorn stood silent, and the other two sat without
moving, wondering what way things would turn.
 Without a word or cry, suddenly, the Riders halted. A thicket of spears were
pointed towards the strangers; and some of the horsemen had bows in hand, and
their arrows were already fitted to the string. Then one rode forward, a tall man, taller
than all the rest; from his helm as a crest a white horsetail flowed. He advanced until
the point of his spear was within a foot of Aragorn's breast. Aragorn did not stir.
 'Who are you, and what are you doing in this land?' said the Rider, using the
Common Speech of the West, in manner and tone like to the speech of Boromir,
Man of Gondor.
 'I am called Strider,' answered Aragorn. 'I came out of the North. I am hunting
Orcs.'
 The Rider leaped from his horse. Giving his spear to another who rode up and
dismounted at his side, he drew his sword and stood face to face with Aragorn,
surveying him keenly, and not without wonder. At length he spoke again.
 'At first I thought that you yourselves were Orcs,' he said, 'but now I see that it is
not so. Indeed you know little of Orcs, if you go hunting them in this fashion. They
were swift and well-armed, and they were many. You would have changed from
hunters to prey, if ever you had overtaken them. But there is something strange
about you, Strider.' He bent his clear bright eyes again upon the Ranger. 'That is no
name for a Man that you give. And strange too is your raiment. Have you sprung out
of the grass? How did you escape our sight? Are you elvish folk?'
 'No,' said Aragorn. 'One only of us is an Elf, Legolas from the Woodland Realm in
distant Mirkwood. But we have passed through Lothlorien, and the gifts and favour of
the Lady go with us.'
 The Rider looked at them with renewed wonder, but his eyes hardened. 'Then
there is a Lady in the Golden Wood, as old tales tell!' he said. 'Few escape her nets,
they say. These are strange days! But if you have her favour, then you also are netweavers and sorcerers,
maybe.' He turned a cold glance suddenly upon Legolas and
Gimli. 'Why do you not speak, silent ones?' he demanded.
 Gimli rose and planted his feet firmly apart: his hand gripped the handle of his axe,
and his dark eyes flashed. 'Give me your name, horse-master, and I will give you
mine, and more besides,' he said.
 'As for that,' said the Rider, staring down at the Dwarf, 'the stranger should declare
himself first. Yet I am named Eomer son of Eomund, and am called the Third
Marshal of Riddermark.'
 16
 'Then Eomer son of Eomund, Third Marshal of Riddermark, let Gimli the Dwarf
Gloin's son warn you against foolish words. You speak evil of that which is fair
beyond the reach of your thought, and only little wit can excuse you.'
 Eomer's eyes blazed, and the Men of Rohan murmured angrily, and closed in,
advancing their spears. 'I would cut off your head, beard and all, Master Dwarf, if it
stood but a little higher from the ground,' said Eomer.
 'He stands not alone,' said Legolas, bending his bow and fitting an arrow with
hands that moved quicker than sight. 'You would die before your stroke fell.'
 Eomer raised his sword, and things might have gone ill, but Aragorn sprang
between them, and raised his hand. 'Your pardon, Eomer!' he cried. 'When you know
more you will understand why you have angered my companions. We intend no evil
to Rohan, nor to any of its folk, neither to man nor to horse. Will you not hear our tale
before you strike?'
 'I will,' said Eomer lowering his blade. 'But wanderers in the Riddermark would be
wise to be less haughty in these days of doubt. First tell me your right name.'
 'First tell me whom you serve,' said Aragorn. 'Are you friend or foe of Sauron, the
Dark Lord of Mordor?'
 'I serve only the Lord of the Mark, Theoden King son of Thengel,' answered
Eomer. 'We do not serve the Power of the Black Land far away, but neither are we
yet at open war with him; and if you are fleeing from him, then you had best leave
this land. There is trouble now on all our borders, and we are threatened; but we
desire only to be free, and to live as we have lived, keeping our own, and serving no
foreign lord, good or evil. We welcomed guests kindly in the better days, but in these
times the unbidden stranger finds us swift and hard. Come! Who are you? Whom do
you serve? At whose command do you hunt Orcs in our land?'
 'I serve no man,' said Aragorn; 'but the servants of Sauron I pursue into whatever
land they may go. There are few among mortal Men who know more of Orcs; and I
do not hunt them in this fashion out of choice. The Orcs whom we pursued took
captive two of my friends. In such need a man that has no horse will go on foot, and
he will not ask for leave to follow the trail. Nor will he count the heads of the enemy
save with a sword. I am not weaponless.'
 Aragorn threw back his cloak. The elven-sheath glittered as he grasped it, and the
bright blade of Anduril shone like a sudden flame as he swept it out. 'Elendil!' he
cried. 'I am Aragorn son of Arathorn and am called Elessar, the Elfstone, Dunadan,
the heir of Isildur Elendil's son of Gondor. Here is the Sword that was Broken and is
forged again! Will you aid me or thwart me? Choose swiftly!'
 Gimli and Legolas looked at their companion in amazement, for they had not seen
him in this mood before. He seemed to have grown in stature while Eomer had
shrunk; and in his living face they caught a brief vision of the power and majesty of
the kings of stone. For a moment it seemed to the eyes of Legolas that a white flame
flickered on the brows of Aragorn like a shining crown.
 Eomer stepped back and a look of awe was in his face. He cast down his proud
eyes. 'These are indeed strange days,' he muttered. 'Dreams and legends spring to
life out of the grass.
 'Tell me, lord,' he said, 'what brings you here? And what was the meaning of the
dark words? Long has Boromir son of Denethor been gone seeking an answer, and
the horse that we lent him came back riderless. What doom do you bring out of the
North?'
 'The doom of choice,' said Aragorn. 'You may say this to Theoden son of Thengel:
open war lies before him, with Sauron or against him. None may live now as they
 17
have lived, and few shall keep what they call their own. But of these great matters
we will speak later. If chance allows, I will come myself to the king. Now I am in great
need, and I ask for help, or at least for tidings. You heard that we are pursuing an
orc-host that carried off our friends. What can you tell us?'
 'That you need not pursue them further,' said Eomer. 'The Orcs are destroyed.'
 'And our friends?'
 'We found none but Orcs.'
 'But that is strange indeed,' said Aragorn. 'Did you search the slain? Were there no
bodies other than those of orc-kind? They would be small. Only children to your
eyes, unshod but clad in grey.'
 'There were no dwarves nor children,' said Eomer. 'We counted all the slain and
despoiled them, and then we piled the carcases and burned them, as is our custom.
The ashes are smoking still.'
 'We do not speak of dwarves or children,' said Gimli. 'Our friends were hobbits.'
 'Hobbits?' said Eomer. 'And what may they be? It is a strange name.'
 'A strange name for a strange folk,' said Gimli. 'But these were very dear to us. It
seems that you have heard in Rohan of the words that troubled Minas Tirith. They
spoke of the Halfling. These hobbits are Halflings.'
 'Halflings!' laughed the Rider that stood beside Eomer. 'Halflings! But they are only
a little people in old songs and children's tales out of the North. Do we walk in
legends or on the green earth in the daylight?'
 'A man may do both,' said Aragorn. 'For not we but those who come after will make
the legends of our time. The green earth, say you? That is a mighty matter of legend,
though you tread it under the light of day!'
 'Time is pressing,' said the Rider, not heeding Aragorn. 'We must hasten south,
lord. Let us leave these wild folk to their fancies. Or let us bind them and take them
to the king.'
 'Peace, Eothain!' said Eomer in his own tongue. 'Leave me a while. Tell the eored
to assemble on the path, and make ready to ride to the Entwade.'
 Muttering Eothain retired, and spoke to the others. Soon they drew off and left
Eomer alone with the three companions.
 'All that you say is strange, Aragorn.' he said. 'Yet you speak the truth, that is plain:
the Men of the Mark do not lie, and therefore they are not easily deceived. But you
have not told all. Will you not now speak more fully of your errand, so that I may
judge what to do?'
 'I set out from Imladris, as it is named in the rhyme, many weeks ago,' answered
Aragorn. 'With me went Boromir of Minas Tirith. My errand was to go to that city with
the son of Denethor, to aid his folk in their war against Sauron. But the Company that
I journeyed with had other business. Of that I cannot speak now. Gandalf the Grey
was our leader.'
 'Gandalf!' Eomer exclaimed. 'Gandalf Greyhame is known in the Mark: but his
name, I warn you, is no longer a password to the king's favour. He has been a guest
in the land many times in the memory of men, coming as he will, after a season, or
after many years. He is ever the herald of strange events: a bringer of evil, some
now say.
 'Indeed since his last coming in the summer all things have gone amiss. At that
time our trouble with Saruman began. Until then we counted Saruman our friend, but
Gandalf came then and warned us that sudden war was preparing in Isengard. He
said that he himself had been a prisoner in Orthanc and had hardly escaped, and he
begged for help. But Theoden would not listen to him, and he went away. Speak not
 18
the name of Gandalf loudly in Theoden's ears! He is wroth. For Gandalf took the
horse that is called Shadowfax, the most precious of all the king's steeds, chief of the
Mearas, which only the Lord of the Mark may ride. For the sire of their race was the
great horse of Eorl that knew the speech of Men. Seven nights ago Shadowfax
returned; but the king's anger is not less, for now the horse is wild and will let no man
handle him.'
 'Then Shadowfax has found his way alone from the far North,' said Aragorn; 'for it
was there that he and Gandalf parted. But alas! Gandalf will ride no longer. He fell
into darkness in the Mines of Moria and comes not again.'
 'That is heavy tidings,' said Eomer. 'At least to me, and to many; though not to all,
as you may find, if you come to the king.'
 'It is tidings more grievous than any in this land can understand, though it may
touch them sorely ere the year is much older,' said Aragorn. 'But when the great fall,
the less must lead. My part it has been to guide our Company on the long road from
Moria. Through Lorien we came – of which it were well that you should learn the
truth ere you speak of it again – and thence down the leagues of the Great River to
the falls of Rauros. There Boromir was slain by the same Orcs whom you destroyed.'
 'Your news is all of woe!' cried Eomer in dismay. 'Great harm is this death to Minas
Tirith, and to us all. That was a worthy man! All spoke his praise. He came seldom to
the Mark, for he was ever in the wars on the East-borders; but I have seen him. More
like to the swift sons of Eorl than to the grave Men of Gondor he seemed to me, and
likely to prove a great captain of his people when his time came. But we have had no
word of this grief out of Gondor. When did he fall?'
 'It is now the fourth day since he was slain,' answered Aragorn, 'and since the
evening of that day we have journeyed from the shadow of Tol Brandir.'
 'On foot?' cried Eomer.
 'Yes, even as you see us.'
 Wide wonder came into Eomer's eyes. 'Strider is too poor a name, son of
Arathorn,' he said. 'Wingfoot I name you. This deed of the three friends should be
sung in many a hall. Forty leagues and five you have measured ere the fourth day is
ended! Hardy is the race of Elendil!
 'But now, lord, what would you have me do! I must return in haste to Theoden. I
spoke warily before my men. It is true that we are not yet at open war with the Black
Land, and there are some, close to the king's ear, that speak craven counsels; but
war is coming. We shall not forsake our old alliance with Gondor, and while they fight
we shall aid them: so say I and all who hold with me. The East-mark is my charge,
the ward of the Third Marshal, and I have removed all our herds and herdfolk,
withdrawing them beyond Entwash, and leaving none here but guards and swift
scouts.'
 'Then you do not pay tribute to Sauron?' said Gimli.
 'We do not and we never have,' said Eomer with a flash of his eyes, 'though it
comes to my ears that that lie has been told. Some years ago the Lord of the Black
Land wished to purchase horses of us at great price, but we refused him, for he puts
beasts to evil use. Then he sent plundering Orcs, and they carry off what they can,
choosing always the black horses: few of these are now left. For that reason our feud
with the Orcs is bitter.
 'But at this time our chief concern is with Saruman. He has claimed lordship over
all this land, and there has been war between us for many months. He has taken
Orcs into his service, and Wolf-riders, and evil Men, and he has closed the Gap
against us, so that we are likely to be beset both east and west.
 19
 'It is ill dealing with such a foe: he is a wizard both cunning and dwimmer-crafty,
having many guises. He walks here and there, they say, as an old man hooded and
cloaked, very like to Gandalf, as many now recall. His spies slip through every net,
and his birds of ill omen are abroad in the sky. I do not know how it will all end, and
my heart misgives me; for it seems to me that his friends do not all dwell in Isengard.
But if you come to the king's house, you shall see for yourself. Will you not come?
Do I hope in vain that you have been sent to me for a help in doubt and need?'
 'I will come when I may,' said Aragorn.
 'Come now!' said Eomer. 'The Heir of Elendil would be a strength indeed to the
Sons of Eorl in this evil tide. There is battle even now upon the Westemnet, and I
fear that it may go ill for us.
 'Indeed in this riding north I went without the king's leave, for in my absence his
house is left with little guard. But scouts warned me of the orc-host coming down out
of the East Wall three nights ago, and among them they reported that some bore the
white badges of Saruman. So suspecting what I most fear, a league between
Orthanc and the Dark Tower, I led forth my eored, men of my own household; and
we overtook the Orcs at nightfall two days ago, near to the borders of the Entwood.
There we surrounded them, and gave battle yesterday at dawn. Fifteen of my men I
lost, and twelve horses alas! For the Orcs were greater in number than we counted
on. Others joined them, coming out of the East across the Great River: their trail is
plain to see a little north of this spot. And others, too, came out of the forest. Great
Orcs, who also bore the White Hand of Isengard: that kind is stronger and more fell
than all others.
 'Nonetheless we put an end to them. But we have been too long away. We are
needed south and west. Will you not come? There are spare horses as you see.
There is work for the Sword to do. Yes, and we could find a use for Gimli's axe and
the bow of Legolas, if they will pardon my rash words concerning the Lady of the
Wood. I spoke only as do all men in my land, and I would gladly learn better.'
 'I thank you for your fair words,' said Aragorn, 'and my heart desires to come with
you; but I cannot desert my friends while hope remains.'
 'Hope does not remain,' said Eomer. 'You will not find your friends on the Northborders.'
 'Yet my friends are not behind. We found a clear token not far from the East Wall
that one at least of them was still alive there. But between the wall and the downs we
have found no other trace of them, and no trail has turned aside, this way or that,
unless my skill has wholly left me.'
 'Then what do you think has become of them?'
 'I do not know. They may have been slain and burned among the Orcs; but that
you will say cannot be, and I do not fear it. I can only think that they were carried off
into the forest before the battle, even before you encircled your foes, maybe. Can
you swear that none escaped your net in such a way?'
 'I would swear that no Orc escaped after we sighted them,' said Eomer. 'We
reached the forest-eaves before them, and if after that any living thing broke through
our ring, then it was no Orc and had some elvish power.'
 'Our friends were attired even as we are,' said Aragorn; 'and you passed us by
under the full light of day.'
 'I had forgotten that,' said Eomer. 'It is hard to be sure of anything among so many
marvels. The world is all grown strange. Elf and Dwarf in company walk in our daily
fields; and folk speak with the Lady of the Wood and yet live; and the Sword comes
back to war that was broken in the long ages ere the fathers of our fathers rode into
 20
the Mark! How shall a man judge what to do in such times?'
 'As he ever has judged,' said Aragorn. 'Good and ill have not changed since
yesteryear; nor are they one thing among Elves and Dwarves, and another among
Men. It is a man's part to discern them, as much in the Golden Wood as in his own
house.'
 'True indeed,' said Eomer. 'But I do not doubt you, nor the deed which my heart
would do. Yet I am not free to do all as I would. It is against our law to let strangers
wander at will in our land, until the king himself shall give them leave, and more strict
is the command in these days of peril. I have begged you to come back willingly with
me, and you will not. Loth am I to begin a battle of one hundred against three.'
 'I do not think your law was made for such a chance,' said Aragorn. 'Nor indeed am
I a stranger; for I have been in this land before, more than once, and ridden with the
host of the Rohirrim, though under other name and in other guise. You I have not
seen before, for you are young, but I have spoken with Eomund your father, and with
Theoden son of Thengel. Never in former days would any high lord of this land have
constrained a man to abandon such a quest as mine. My duty at least is clear, to go
on. Come now, son of Eomund, the choice must be made at last. Aid us, or at the
worst let us go free. Or seek to carry out your law. If you do so there will be fewer to
return to your war or to your king.'
 Eomer was silent for a moment, then he spoke. 'We both have need of haste,' he
said. 'My company chafes to be away, and every hour lessens your hope. This is my
choice. You may go; and what is more, I will lend you horses. This only I ask: when
your quest is achieved, or is proved vain, return with the horses over the Entwade to
Meduseld, the high house in Edoras where Theoden now sits. Thus you shall prove
to him that I have not misjudged. In this I place myself, and maybe my very life, in
the keeping of your good faith. Do not fail.'
 'I will not,' said Aragorn.
 There was great wonder, and many dark and doubtful glances, among his men,
when Eomer gave orders that the spare horses were to be lent to the strangers; but
only Eothain dared to speak openly.
 'It may be well enough for this lord of the race of Gondor, as he claims,' he said,
'but who has heard of a horse of the Mark being given to a Dwarf?'
 'No one,' said Gimli. 'And do not trouble: no one will ever hear of it. I would sooner
walk than sit on the back of any beast so great, free or begrudged.'
 'But you must ride now, or you will hinder us,' said Aragorn.
 'Come, you shall sit behind me, friend Gimli, said Legolas. Then all will be well, and
you need neither borrow a horse nor be troubled by one.'
 A great dark-grey horse was brought to Aragorn, and he mounted it. 'Hasufel is his
name,' said Eomer. 'May he bear you well and to better fortune than Garulf, his late
master!'
 A smaller and lighter horse, but restive and fiery, was brought to Legolas. Arod
was his name. But Legolas asked them to take off saddle and rein. 'I need them not,'
he said, and leaped lightly up, and to their wonder Arod was tame and willing
beneath him, moving here and there with but a spoken word: such was the elvish
way with all good beasts. Gimli was lifted up behind his friend, and he clung to him,
not much more at ease than Sam Gamgee in a boat.
 'Farewell, and may you find what you seek!' cried Eomer. 'Return with what speed
you may, and let our swords hereafter shine together!'
 'I will come,' said Aragorn.
 'And I will come, too,' said Gimli. 'The matter of the Lady Galadriel lies still between
 21
us. I have yet to teach you gentle speech. '
 'We shall see,' said Eomer. 'So many strange things have chanced that to learn the
praise of a fair lady under the loving strokes of a Dwarf's axe will seem no great
wonder. Farewell!'
 With that they parted. Very swift were the horses of Rohan. When after a little Gimli
looked back, the company of Eomer were already small and far away. Aragorn did
not look back: he was watching the trail as they sped on their way, bending low with
his head beside the neck of Hasufel. Before long they came to the borders of the
Entwash, and there they met the other trail of which Eomer had spoken, coming
down from the East out of the Wold.
 Aragorn dismounted and surveyed the ground, then leaping back into the saddle,
he rode away for some distance eastward, keeping to one side and taking care not
to override the footprints. Then he again dismounted and examined the ground,
going backwards and forwards on foot.
 'There is little to discover,' he said when he returned. 'The main trail is all confused
with the passage of the horsemen as they came back; their outward course must
have lain nearer the river. But this eastward trail is fresh and clear. There is no sign
there of any feet going the other way, back towards Anduin. Now we must ride
slower, and make sure that no trace or footstep branches off on either side. The
Orcs must have been aware from this point that they were pursued; they may have
made some attempt to get their captives away before they were overtaken.'
 As they rode forward the day was overcast. Low grey clouds came over the Wold.
A mist shrouded the sun. Ever nearer the tree-clad slopes of Fangorn loomed, slowly
darkling as the sun went west. They saw no sign of any trail to right or left, but here
and there they passed single Orcs, fallen in their tracks as they ran, with greyfeathered arrows sticking in
back or throat.
 At last as the afternoon was waning they came to the eaves of the forest, and in an
open glade among the first trees they found the place of the great burning: the ashes
were still hot and smoking. Beside it was a great pile of helms and mail, cloven
shields, and broken swords, bows and darts and other gear of war. Upon a stake in
the middle was set a great goblin head; upon its shattered helm the white badge
could still be seen. Further away, not far from the river, where it came streaming out
from the edge of the wood, there was a mound. It was newly raised: the raw earth
was covered with fresh-cut turves: about it were planted fifteen spears.
 Aragorn and his companions searched far and wide about the field of battle, but
the light faded, and evening soon drew down, dim and misty. By nightfall they had
discovered no trace of Merry and Pippin.
 'We can do no more,' said Gimli sadly. 'We have been set many riddles since we
came to Tol Brandir, but this is the hardest to unravel. I would guess that the burned
bones of the hobbits are now mingled with the Orcs'. It will be hard news for Frodo, if
he lives to hear it; and hard too for the old hobbit who waits in Rivendell. Elrond was
against their coming.'
 'But Gandalf was not,' said Legolas.
 'But Gandalf chose to come himself, and he was the first to be lost,' answered
Gimli. 'His foresight failed him.'
 'The counsel of Gandalf was not founded on foreknowledge of safety, for himself or
for others,' said Aragorn. 'There are some things that it is better to begin than to
refuse, even though the end may be dark. But I shall not depart from this place yet.
In any case we must here await the morning-light.'
 A little way beyond the battle-field they made their camp under a spreading tree: it
 22
looked like a chestnut, and yet it still bore many broad brown leaves of a former year,
like dry hands with long splayed fingers; they rattled mournfully in the night-breeze.
 Gimli shivered. They had brought only one blanket apiece. 'Let us light a fire,' he
said. 'I care no longer for the danger. Let the Orcs come as thick as summer-moths
round a candle!'
 'If those unhappy hobbits are astray in the woods, it might draw them hither,' said
Legolas.
 'And it might draw other things, neither Orc nor Hobbit,' said Aragorn. 'We are near
to the mountain-marches of the traitor Saruman. Also we are on the very edge of
Fangorn, and it is perilous to touch the trees of that wood, it is said.'
 'But the Rohirrim made a great burning here yesterday,' said Gimli, 'and they felled
trees for the fire, as can be seen. Yet they passed the night after safely here, when
their labour was ended.'
 'They were many,' said Aragorn, 'and they do not heed the wrath of Fangorn, for
they come here seldom, and they do not go under the trees. But our paths are likely
to lead us into the very forest itself. So have a care! Cut no living wood!'
 'There is no need,' said Gimli. 'The Riders have left chip and bough enough, and
there is dead wood lying in plenty.' He went off to gather fuel, and busied himself
with building and kindling a fire; but Aragorn sat silent with his back to the great tree,
deep in thought; and Legolas stood alone in the open, looking towards the profound
shadow of the wood, leaning forward, as one who listens to voices calling from a
distance.
 When the Dwarf had a small bright blaze going, the three companions drew close
to it and sat together, shrouding the light with their hooded forms. Legolas looked up
at the boughs of the tree reaching out above them.
 'Look!' he said. 'The tree is glad of the fire!'
 It may have been that the dancing shadows tricked their eyes, but certainly to each
of the companions the boughs appeared to be bending this way and that so as to
come above the flames, while the upper branches were stooping down; the brown
leaves now stood out stiff, and rubbed together like many cold cracked hands taking
comfort in the warmth.
 There was a silence, for suddenly the dark and unknown forest, so near at hand,
made itself felt as a great brooding presence, full of secret purpose. After a while
Legolas spoke again.
 'Celeborn warned us not to go far into Fangorn,' he said. 'Do you know why,
Aragorn? What are the fables of the forest that Boromir had heard?'
 'I have heard many tales in Gondor and elsewhere,' said Aragorn, 'but if it were not
for the words of Celeborn I should deem them only fables that Men have made as
true knowledge fades. I had thought of asking you what was the truth of the matter.
And if an Elf of the Wood does not know, how shall a Man answer?'
 'You have journeyed further than I,' said Legolas. 'I have heard nothing of this in
my own land, save only songs that tell how the Onodrim, that Men call Ents, dwelt
there long ago; for Fangorn is old, old even as the Elves would reckon it.'
 'Yes, it is old,' said Aragorn, 'as old as the forest by the Barrow-downs, and it is far
greater. Elrond says that the two are akin, the last strongholds of the mighty woods
of the Elder Days, in which the Firstborn roamed while Men still slept. Yet Fangorn
holds some secret of its own. What it is I do not know.'
 'And I do not wish to know,' said Gimli. 'Let nothing that dwells in Fangorn be
troubled on my account!'
 They now drew lots for the watches, and the lot for the first watch fell to Gimli. The
 23
others lay down. Almost at once sleep laid hold on them. 'Gimli!' said Aragorn
drowsily. 'Remember, it is perilous to cut bough or twig from a living tree in Fangorn.
But do not stray far in search of dead wood. Let the fire die rather! Call me at need!'
 With that he fell asleep. Legolas already lay motionless, his fair hands folded upon
his breast, his eyes unclosed, blending living night and deep dream, as is the way
with Elves. Gimli sat hunched by the fire, running his thumb thoughtfully along the
edge of his axe. The tree rustled. There was no other sound.
 Suddenly Gimli looked up, and there just on the edge of the fire-light stood an old
bent man, leaning on a staff, and wrapped in a great cloak; his wide-brimmed hat
was pulled down over his eyes. Gimli sprang up, too amazed for the moment to cry
out, though at once the thought flashed into his mind that Saruman had caught them.
Both Aragorn and Legolas, roused by his sudden movement, sat up and stared. The
old man did not speak or make, sign.
 'Well, father, what can we do for you?' said Aragorn, leaping to his feet. 'Come and
be warm, if you are cold!' He strode forward, but the old man was gone. There was
no trace of him to be found near at hand, and they did not dare to wander far. The
moon had set and the night was very dark.
 Suddenly Legolas gave a cry. 'The horses! The horses!'
 The horses were gone. They had dragged their pickets and disappeared. For me
time the three companions stood still and silent, troubled by this new stroke of ill
fortune. They were under the eaves of Fangorn, and endless leagues lay between
them and the Men of Rohan, their only friends in this wide and dangerous land. As
they stood, it seemed to them that they heard, far off in the night, the sound of
horses whinnying and neighing. Then all was quiet again, except for the cold rustle
of the wind.
 'Well, they are gone,' said Aragorn at last. 'We cannot find them or catch them; so
that if they do not return of their own will, we must do without. We started on our feet,
and we have those still.'
 'Feet!' said Gimli. 'But we cannot eat them as well as walk on them,' He threw
some fuel on the fire and slumped down beside it.
 'Only a few hours ago you were unwilling to sit on a horse of Rohan,' laughed
Legolas. 'You will make a rider yet.'
 'It seems unlikely that I shall have the chance,' said Gimli.
 'If you wish to know what I think,' he began again after a while 'I think it was
Saruman. Who else? Remember the words of Eomer: he walks about like an old
man hooded and cloaked. Those were the words. He has gone off with our horses,
or scared them away, and here we are. There is more trouble coming to us, mark my
words!'
 'I mark them,' said Aragorn. 'But I marked also that this old man had a hat not a
hood. Still I do not doubt that you guess right, and that we are in peril here, by night
or day. Yet in the meantime there is nothing that we can do but rest, while we may. I
will watch for a while now, Gimli. I have more need of thought than of sleep.'
 The night passed slowly. Legolas followed Aragorn, and Gimli followed Legolas,
and their watches wore away. But nothing happened. The old man did not appear
again, and the horses did not return.
 24
Chapter 3
The Uruk-Hai
 Pippin lay in a dark and troubled dream: it seemed that he could hear his own
small voice echoing in black tunnels, calling Frodo, Frodo! But instead of Frodo
hundreds of hideous orc-faces grinned at him out of the shadows, hundreds of
hideous arms grasped at him from every side. Where was Merry?
 He woke. Cold air blew on his face. He was lying on his back. Evening was coming
and the sky above was growing dim. He turned and found that the dream was little
worse than the waking. His wrists, legs, and ankles were tied with cords. Beside him
Merry lay, white-faced, with a dirty rag bound across his brows. All about them sat or
stood a great company of Orcs.
 Slowly in Pippin's aching head memory pieced itself together and became
separated from dream-shadows. Of course: he and Merry had run off into the woods.
What had come over them? Why had they dashed off like that, taking no notice of
old Strider? They had run a long way shouting – he could not remember how far or
how long; and then suddenly they had crashed right into a group of Orcs: they were
standing listening, and they did not appear to see Merry and Pippin until they were
almost in their arms. Then they yelled and dozens of other goblins had sprung out of
the trees. Merry and he had drawn their swords, but the Orcs did not wish to fight,
and had tried only to lay hold of them, even when Merry had cut off several of their
arms and hands. Good old Merry!
 Then Boromir had come leaping through the trees. He had made them fight. He
slew many of them and the rest fled. But they had not gone far on the way back
when they were attacked again. by a hundred Orcs at least, some of them very
large, and they shot a rain of arrows: always at Boromir. Boromir had blown his great
horn till the woods rang, and at first the Orcs had been dismayed and had drawn
back; but when no answer but the echoes came, they had attacked more fierce than
ever. Pippin did not remember much more. His last memo was of Boromir leaning
against a tree, plucking out an arrow; then darkness fell suddenly.
 'I suppose I was knocked on the head,' he said to himself. 'I wonder if poor Merry is
much hurt. What has happened to Boromir? Why didn't the Orcs kill us? Where are
we, and where are we going?'
 He could not answer the questions. He felt cold and sick. 'I wish Gandalf had never
persuaded Elrond to let us come,' he thought. 'What good have I been? Just a
nuisance: a passenger, a piece of luggage. And now I have been stolen and I am
just a piece of luggage for the Orcs. I hope Strider or someone will come and claim
us! But ought I to hope for it? Won't that throw out all the plans? I wish I could get
free!'
 He struggled a little, quite uselessly. One of the Orcs sitting near laughed and said
something to a companion in their abominable tongue. 'Rest while you can, little
fool!' he said then to Pippin, in the Common Speech, which he made almost as
hideous as his own language. 'Rest while you can! We'll find a use for your legs
before long. You'll wish you had got none before we get home.'
 'If I had my way, you'd wish you were dead now,' said the other. 'I'd make you
squeak, you miserable rat.' He stooped over Pippin bringing his yellow fangs close to
his face. He had a black knife with a long jagged blade in his hand. 'Lie quiet, or I'll
tickle you with this,' he hissed. 'Don't draw attention to yourself, or I may forget my
orders. Curse the Isengarders! Ugluk u bagronk sha pushdug Saruman-glob
bubhosh skai': he passed into a long angry speech in his own tongue that slowly died
 25
away into muttering and snarling.
 Terrified Pippin lay still, though the pain at his wrists and ankles was growing, and
the stones beneath him were boring into his back. To take his mind off himself he
listened intently to all that he could hear. There were many voices round about, and
though orc-speech sounded at all times full of hate and anger, it seemed plain that
something like a quarrel had begun, and was getting hotter.
 To Pippin's surprise he found that much of the talk was intelligible many of the
Orcs were using ordinary language. Apparently the members of two or three quite
different tribes were present, and they could not understand one another's orcspeech. There was an
angry debate concerning what they were to do now: which
way they were to take and what should be done with the prisoners.
 'There's no time to kill them properly,' said one. 'No time for play on this trip.'
 'That can't be helped,' said another. 'But why not kill them quick, kill them now?
They're a cursed nuisance, and we're in a hurry. Evening's coming on, and we ought
to get a move on.'
 'Orders.' said a third voice in a deep growl. 'Kill all but not the Halfings; they are to
be brought back alive as quickly as possible. That's my orders.'
 'What are they wanted for?' asked several voices. 'Why alive? Do they give good
sport?'
 'No! I heard that one of them has got something, something that's wanted for the
War, some elvish plot or other. Anyway they'll both be questioned.'
 'Is that all you know? Why don't we search them and find out? We might find
something that we could use ourselves.'
 'That is a very interesting remark,' sneered a voice, softer than the others but more
evil. 'I may have to report that. The prisoners are not to be searched or plundered:
those are my orders.'
 'And mine too,' said the deep voice. 'Alive and as captured; no spoiling. That's my
orders.'
 'Not our orders!' said one of the earlier voices. 'We have come all the way from the
Mines to kill, and avenge our folk. I wish to kill, and then go back north.'
 'Then you can wish again,' said the growling voice. 'I am Ugluk. I command. I
return to Isengard by the shortest road.'
 'Is Saruman the master or the Great Eye?' said the evil voice. 'We should go back
at once to Lugburz.'
 'If we could cross the Great River, we might,' said another voice. 'But there are not
enough of us to venture down to the bridges.'
 'I came across,' said the evil voice. 'A winged Nazgul awaits us northward on the
east-bank.'
 'Maybe, maybe! Then you'll fly off with our prisoners, and get all the pay and praise
in Lugburz, and leave us to foot it as best we can through the Horse-country. No, we
must stick together. These lands are dangerous: full of foul rebels and brigands.'
 'Aye, we must stick together,' growled Ugluk. 'I don't trust you little swine. You've
no guts outside your own sties. But for us you'd all have run away. We are the
fighting Uruk-hai! We slew the great warrior. We took the prisoners. We are the
servants of Saruman the Wise, the White Hand: the Hand that gives us man's-flesh
to eat. We came out of Isengard, and led you here, and we shall lead you back by
the way we choose. I am Ugluk. I have spoken.'
 'You have spoken more than enough, Ugluk,' sneered the evil voice. 'I wonder how
they would like it in Lugburz. They might think that Ugluk's shoulders needed
relieving of a swollen head. They might ask where his strange ideas came from. Did
 26
they come from Saruman, perhaps? Who does he think he is, setting up on his own
with his filthy white badges? They might agree with me, with Grishnakh their trusted
messenger; and I Grishnakh say this: Saruman is a fool, and a dirty treacherous fool.
But the Great Eye is on him.
 'Swine is it? How do you folk like being called swine by the muck-rakers of a dirty
little wizard? It's orc-flesh they eat, I'll warrant.'
 Many loud yells in orc-speech answered him, and the ringing clash of weapons
being drawn. Cautiously Pippin rolled over, hoping to see what would happen. His
guards had gone to join in the fray. In the twilight he saw a large black Orc, probably
Ugluk, standing facing Grishnakh, a short crook-legged creature, very broad and with
long arms that hung almost to the ground. Round them were many smaller goblins.
Pippin supposed that these were the ones from the North. They had drawn their
knives and swords, but hesitated to attack Ugluk.
 Ugluk shouted, and a number of other Orcs of nearly his own size ran up. Then
suddenly, without warning, Ugluk sprang forwards, and with two swift strokes swept
the heads off two of his opponents. Grishnakh stepped aside and vanished into the
shadows. The others gave way, and one stepped backwards and fell over Merry's
prostrate form with a curse. Yet that probably saved his life, for Ugluk's followers
leaped over him and cut down another with their broad-bladed swords. It was the
yellow-fanged guard. His body fell right on top of Pippin, still clutching its long sawedged knife.
 'Put up your weapons!' shouted Ugluk. 'And let's have no more nonsense! We go
straight west from here, and down the stair. From there straight to the downs, then
along the river to the forest. And we march day and night. That clear?'
 'Now,' thought Pippin, 'if only it takes that ugly fellow a little while to get his troop
under control, I've got a chance.' A gleam of hope had come to him. The edge of the
black knife had snicked his arm, and then slid down to his wrist. He felt the blood
trickling on to his hand, but he also felt the cold touch of steel against his skin.
 The Orcs were getting ready to march again, but some of the Northerners were still
unwilling, and the Isengarders slew two more before the rest were cowed. There was
much cursing and confusion. For the moment Pippin was unwatched. His legs were
securely bound, but his arms were only tied about the wrists, and his hands were in
front of him. He could move them both together, though the bonds were cruelly tight.
He pushed the dead Orc to one side, then hardly daring to breathe, he drew the knot
of the wrist-cord up and down against the blade of the knife. It was sharp and the
dead hand held it fast. The cord was cut! Quickly Pippin took it in his fingers and
knotted it again into a loose bracelet of two loops and slipped it over his hands. Then
he lay very still.
 'Pick up those prisoners!' shouted Ugluk. 'Don't play any tricks with them! If they
are not alive when we get back, someone else will die too.'
 An Orc seized Pippin like a sack, put its head between his tied hands, grabbed his
arms and dragged them down, until Pippin's face was crushed against its neck; then
it jolted off with him. Another treated Merry in the same way. The Orc's clawlike hand
gripped Pippin's arms like iron; the nails bit into him. He shut his eyes and slipped
back into evil dreams.
 Suddenly he was thrown on to the stony floor again. It was early night, but the slim
moon was already falling westward. They were on the edge of a cliff that seemed to
look out over a sea of pale mist. There was a sound of water falling nearby.
 'The scouts have come back at last,' said an Orc close at hand.
 'Well, what did you discover?' growled the voice of Ugluk.
 27
 'Only a single horseman, and he made off westwards. All's clear now.'
 'Now, I daresay. But how long? You fools! You should have shot him. He'll raise
the alarm. The cursed horsebreeders will hear of us by morning. Now we'll have to
leg it double quick.'
 A shadow bent over Pippin. It was Ugluk. 'Sit up!' said the Orc. 'My lads are tired of
lugging you about. We have got to climb down and you must use your legs. Be
helpful now. No crying out, no trying to escape. We have ways of paying for tricks
that you won't like, though they won't spoil your usefulness for the Master.'
 He cut the thongs round Pippin's legs and ankles, picked him up by his hair and
stood him on his feet. Pippin fell down, and Ugluk dragged him up by his hair again.
Several Orcs laughed. Ugluk thrust a flask between his teeth and poured some
burning liquid down his throat: he felt a hot fierce glow flow through him. The pain in
his legs and ankles vanished. He could stand.
 'Now for the other!' said Ugluk. Pippin saw him go to Merry, who was lying close
by, and kick him. Merry groaned. Seizing him roughly Ugluk pulled him into a sitting
position, and tore the bandage off his head. Then he smeared the wound with some
dark stuff out of a small wooden box. Merry cried out and struggled wildly.
 The Orcs clapped and hooted. 'Can't take his medicine,' they jeered. 'Doesn't know
what's good for him. Ai! We shall have some fun later.'
 But at the moment Ugluk was not engaged in sport. He needed speed and had to
humour unwilling followers. He was healing Merry in orc-fashion; and his treatment
worked swiftly. When he had forced a drink from his flask down the hobbit's throat,
cut his leg-bonds, and dragged him to his feet, Merry stood up, looking pale but grim
and defiant, and very much alive. The gash in his forehead gave him no more
trouble, but he bore a brown scar to the end of his days.
 'Hullo, Pippin!' he said. 'So you've come on this little expedition, too? Where do we
get bed and breakfast?'
 'Now then!' said Ugluk. 'None of that! Hold your tongues. No talk to one another.
Any trouble will be reported at the other end, and He'll know how to pay you. You'll
get bed and breakfast all right: more than you can stomach.'
 The orc-band began to descend a narrow ravine leading down into the misty plain
below. Merry and Pippin, separated by a dozen Orcs or more, climbed down with
them. At the bottom they stepped on to grass, and the hearts of the hobbits rose.
 'Now straight on!' shouted Ugluk. 'West and a little north. Follow Lugdush.'
 'But what are we going to do at sunrise?' said some of the Northerners.
 'Go on running,' said Ugluk. 'What do you think? Sit on the grass and wait for the
Whiteskins to join the picnic?'
 'But we can't run in the sunlight.'
 'You'll run with me behind you,' said Ugluk. 'Run! Or you'll never see your beloved
holes again. By the White Hand! What's the use of sending out mountain-maggots
on a trip, only half trained. Run, curse you! Run while night lasts!'
 Then the whole company began to run with the long loping strides of Orcs. They
kept no order, thrusting, jostling, and cursing; yet their speed was very great. Each
hobbit had a guard of three. Pippin was far back in the line. He wondered how long
he would be able to go on at this pace: he had had no food since the morning. One
of his guards had a whip. But at present the orc-liquor was still hot in him. His wits,
too, were wide awake.
 Every now and again there came into his mind unbidden a vision of the keen face
of Strider bending over a dark trail, and running, running behind. But what could
even a Ranger see except a confused trail of orc-feet? His own little prints and
 28
Merry's were overwhelmed by the trampling of the iron-shod shoes before them and
behind them and about them.
 They had gone only a mile or so from the cliff when the land sloped down into a
wide shallow depression, where the ground was soft and wet. Mist lay there, paleglimmering in the last
rays of the sickle moon. The dark shapes of the Orcs in front
grew dim, and then were swallowed up.
 'Ai! Steady now!' shouted Ugluk from the rear.
 A sudden thought leaped into Pippin's mind, and he acted on it at once. He
swerved aside to the right, and dived out of the reach of his clutching guard,
headfirst into the mist; he landed sprawling on the grass.
 'Halt!' yelled Ugluk.
 There was for a moment turmoil and confusion. Pippin sprang up and ran. But the
Orcs were after him. Some suddenly loomed up right in front of him.
 'No hope of escape!' thought Pippin. 'But there is a hope that I have left some of
my own marks unspoilt on the wet ground.' He groped with his two tied hands at his
throat, and unclasped the brooch of his cloak. Just as long arms and hard claws
seized him, he let it fall. 'There I suppose it will lie until the end of time,' he thought. 'I
don't know why I did it. If the others have escaped, they've probably all gone with
Frodo.'
 A whip-thong curled round his legs, and he stifled a cry.
 'Enough!' shouted Ugluk running up. 'He's still got to run a long way yet. Make 'em
both run! Just use the whip as a reminder.'
 'But that's not all,' he snarled, turning to Pippin. 'I shan't forget. Payment is only put
off. Leg it!'
 Neither Pippin nor Merry remembered much of the later part of the journey. Evil
dreams and evil waking were blended into a long tunnel of misery, with hope growing
ever fainter behind. They ran, and they ran, striving to keep up the pace set by the
Orcs, licked every now and again with a cruel thong cunningly handled. If they halted
or stumbled, they were seized and dragged for some distance.
 The warmth of the orc-draught had gone. Pippin felt cold and sick again. Suddenly
he fell face downward on the turf. Hard hands with rending nails gripped and lifted
him. He was carried like a sack once more, and darkness grew about him: whether
the darkness of another night, or a blindness of his eyes, he could not tell.
 Dimly he became aware of voices clamouring: it seemed that many of the Orcs
were demanding a halt. Ugluk was shouting. He felt himself flung to the ground, and
he lay as he fell, till black dreams took him. But he did not long escape from pain;
soon the iron grip of merciless hands was on him again. For a long time he was
tossed and shaken, and then slowly the darkness gave way, and he came back to
the waking world and found that it was morning. Orders were shouted and he was
thrown roughly on the grass.
 There he lay for a while, fighting with despair. His head swam, but from the heat in
his body he guessed that he had been given another draught. An Orc stooped over
him, and flung him some bread and a strip of raw dried flesh. He ate the stale grey
bread hungrily, but not the meat. He was famished but not yet so famished as to eat
flesh flung to him by an Orc, the flesh of he dared not guess what creature.
 He sat up and looked about. Merry was not far away. They were by the banks of a
swift narrow river. Ahead mountains loomed: a tall peak was catching the first rays of
the sun. A dark smudge of forest lay on the lower slopes before them.
 There was much shouting and debating among the Orcs; a quarrel seemed on the
point of breaking out again between the Northerners and the Isengarders. Some
 29
were pointing back away south, and some were pointing eastward.
 'Very well,' said Ugluk. 'Leave them to me then! No killing, as I've told you before;
but if you want to throw away what we've come all the way to get, throw it away! I'll
look after it. Let the fighting Uruk-hai do the work, as usual. If you're afraid of the
Whiteskins, run! Run! There's the forest,' he shouted, pointing ahead. 'Get to it! It's
your best hope. Off you go! And quick, before I knock a few more heads off, to put
some sense into the others.'
 There was some cursing and scuffling, and then most of the Northerners broke
away and dashed off, over a hundred of them, running wildly along the river towards
the mountains. The hobbits were left with the Isengarders: a grim dark band, four
score at least of large, swart, slant-eyed Orcs with great bows and short broadbladed swords. A few of
the larger and bolder Northerners remained with them.
 'Now we'll deal with Grishnakh,' said Ugluk; but some even of his own followers
were looking uneasily southwards.
 'I know,' growled Ugluk. 'The cursed horse-boys have got wind of us. But that's all
your fault, Snaga. You and the other scouts ought to have your ears cut off. But we
are the fighters. We'll feast on horseflesh yet, or something better.'
 At that moment Pippin saw why some of the troop had been pointing eastward.
From that direction there now came hoarse cries, and there was Grishnakh again,
and at his back a couple of score of others like him: long-armed crook-legged Orcs.
They had a red eye painted on their shields. Ugluk stepped forward to meet them.
'So you've come back?' he said. 'Thought better of it, eh?'
 'I've returned to see that Orders are carried out and the prisoners safe,' answered
Grishnakh.
 'Indeed!' said Ugluk. 'Waste of effort. I'll see that orders are carried out in my
command. And what else did you come back for? You went in a hurry. Did you leave
anything behind?'
 'I left a fool,' snarled Grishnakh. 'But there were some stout fellows with him that
are too good to lose. I knew you'd lead them into a mess. I've come to help them.'
 'Splendid!' laughed Ugluk. 'But unless you've got some guts for fighting, you've
taken the wrong way. Lugburz was your road. The Whiteskins are coming. What's
happened to your precious Nazgul? Has he had another mount shot under him?
Now, if you'd brought him along, that might have been useful – if these Nazgul are all
they make out.'
 'Nazgul, Nazgul,' said Grishnakh, shivering and licking his lips, as if the word had a
foul taste that he savoured painfully. 'You speak of what is deep beyond the reach of
your muddy dreams, Ugluk,' he said. 'Nazgul! Ah! All that they make out! One day
you'll wish that you had not said that. Ape!' he snarled fiercely. 'You ought to know
that they're the apple of the Great Eye. But the winged Nazgul: not yet, not yet. He
won't let them show themselves across the Great River yet, not too soon. They're for
the War – and other purposes.'
 'You seem to know a lot,' said Ugluk. 'More than is good for you, I guess. Perhaps
those in Lugburz might wonder how, and why. But in the meantime the Uruk-hai of
Isengard can do the dirty work, as usual. Don't stand slavering there! Get your rabble
together! The other swine are legging it to the forest. You'd better follow. You
wouldn't get back to the Great River alive. Right off the mark! Now! I'll be on your
heels.'
 The Isengarders seized Merry and Pippin again and slung them on their backs.
Then the troop started off. Hour after hour they ran, pausing now and again only to
sling the hobbits to fresh carriers. Either because they were quicker and hardier, or
 30
because of some plan of Grishnakh's, the Isengarders gradually passed through the
Orcs of Mordor, and Grishnakh's folk closed in behind. Soon they were gaining also
on the Northerners ahead. The forest began to draw nearer.
 Pippin was bruised and torn, his aching head was grated by the filthy jowl and
hairy ear of the Orc that held him. Immediately in front were bowed backs, and tough
thick legs going up and down, up and down, unresting, as if they were made of wire
and horn, beating out the nightmare seconds of an endless time.
 In the afternoon Ugluk's troop overtook the Northerners. They were flagging in the
rays of the bright sun, winter sun shining in a pale cool sky though it was; their heads
were down and their tongues lolling out.
 'Maggots!' jeered the Isengarders. 'You're cooked. The Whiteskins will catch you
and eat you. They're coming!'
 A cry from Grishnakh showed that this was not mere jest. Horsemen, riding very
swiftly, had indeed been sighted: still far behind, but gaining on the Orcs, gaining on
them like a tide over the flats on folk straying in a quicksand.
 The Isengarders began to run with a redoubled pace that astonished Pippin, a
terrific spurt it seemed for the end of a race. Then he saw that the sun was sinking,
falling behind the Misty Mountains; shadows reached over the land. The soldiers of
Mordor lifted their heads and also began to put on speed. The forest was dark and
close. Already they had passed a few outlying trees. The land was beginning to
slope upwards. ever more steeply; but the Orcs did not halt. Both Ugluk and
Grishnakh shouted, spurring them on to a last effort.
 'They will make it yet. They will escape,' thought Pippin. And then he managed to
twist his neck, so as to glance back with one eye over his shoulder. He saw that
riders away eastward were already level with the Orcs, galloping over the plain. The
sunset gilded their spears and helmets, and glinted in their pale flowing hair. They
were hemming the Orcs in, preventing them from scattering, and driving them along
the line of the river.
 He wondered very much what kind of folk they were. He wished now that he had
learned more in Rivendell, and looked more at maps and things; but in those days
the plans for the journey seemed to be in more competent hands, and he had never
reckoned with being cut off from Gandalf, or from Strider, and even from Frodo. All
that he could remember about Rohan was that Gandalf's horse, Shadowfax, had
come from that land. That sounded hopeful, as far as it went.
 'But how will they know that we are not Orcs?' he thought. 'I don't suppose they've
ever heard of hobbits down here. I suppose I ought to be glad that the beastly Orcs
look like being destroyed, but I would rather be saved myself.' The chances were
that he and Merry would be killed together with their captors, before ever the Men of
Rohan were aware of them.
 A few of the riders appeared to be bowmen, skilled at shooting from a running
horse. Riding swiftly into range they shot arrows at the Orcs that straggled behind,
and several of them fell; then the riders wheeled away out of the range of the
answering bows of their enemies, who shot wildly, not daring to halt. This happened
many times, and on one occasion arrows fell among the Isengarders. One of them,
just in front of Pippin, stumbled and did not get up again.
 Night came down without the Riders closing in for battle. Many Orcs had fallen, but
fully two hundred remained. In the early darkness the Orcs came to a hillock. The
eaves of the forest were very near, probably no more than three furlongs away, but
they could go no further. The horsemen had encircled them. A small band disobeyed
Ugluk's command, and ran on towards the forest: only three returned.
 31
 'Well, here we are,' sneered Grishnakh. 'Fine leadership! I hope the great Ugluk
will lead us out again.'
 'Put those Halflings down!' ordered Ugluk, taking no notice of Grishnakh. 'You,
Lugdush, get two others and stand guard over them! They're not to be killed, unless
the filthy Whiteskins break through. Understand? As long as I'm alive, I want 'em. But
they're not to cry out, and they're not to be rescued. Bind their legs!'
 The last part of the order was carried out mercilessly. But Pippin found that for the
first time he was close to Merry. The Orcs were making a great deal of noise,
shouting and clashing their weapons, and the hobbits managed to whisper together
for a while.
 'I don't think much of this,' said Merry. 'I feel nearly done in. Don't think I could
crawl away far, even if I was free.'
 'Lembas!' whispered Pippin. 'Lembas: I've got some. Have you? I don't think
they've taken anything but our swords.'
 'Yes, I had a packet in my pocket,' answered Merry, 'but it must be battered to
crumbs. Anyway I can't put my mouth in my pocket!'
 'You won't have to. I've—'; but just then a savage kick warned Pippin that the noise
had died down, and the guards were watchful.
 The night was cold and still. All round the knoll on which the Orcs were gathered
little watch-fires sprang up, golden-red in the darkness, a complete ring of them.
They were within a long bowshot, but the riders did not show themselves against the
light, and the Orcs wasted many arrows shooting at the fires, until Ugluk stopped
them. The riders made no sound. Later in the night when the moon came out of the
mist, then occasionally they could be seen, shadowy shapes that glinted now and
again in the white light, as they moved in ceaseless patrol.
 'They'll wait for the Sun, curse them!' growled one of the guards. 'Why don't we get
together and charge through? What's old Ugluk think he's doing, I should like to
know?'
 'I daresay you would,' snarled Ugluk stepping up from behind. 'Meaning I don't
think at all, eh? Curse you! You're as bad as the other rabble: the maggots and the
apes of Lugburz. No good trying to charge with them. They'd just squeal and bolt,
and there are more than enough of these filthy horse-boys to mop up our lot on the
flat.
 'There's only one thing those maggots can do: they can see like gimlets in the
dark. But these Whiteskins have better night-eyes than most Men, from all I've
heard; and don't forget their horses! They can see the night-breeze, or so it's said.
Still there's one thing the fine fellows don't know: Mauhur and his lads are in the
forest, and they should turn up any time now.'
 Ugluk's words were enough, apparently, to satisfy the Isengarders; but the other
Orcs were both dispirited and rebellious. They posted a few watchers, but most of
them lay on the ground, resting in the pleasant darkness. It did indeed become very
dark again; for the moon passed westward into thick cloud, and Pippin could not see
anything a few feet away. The fires brought no light to the hillock. The riders were
not, however, content merely to wait for the dawn and let their enemies rest. A
sudden outcry on the east side of the knoll showed that something was wrong. It
seemed that some of the Men had ridden in close, slipped off their horses, crawled
to the edge of the camp and killed several Orcs, and then had faded away again.
Ugluk dashed off to stop a stampede.
 Pippin and Merry sat up. Their guards, Isengarders, had gone with Ugluk. But if the
hobbits had any thought of escape, it was soon dashed. A long hairy arm took each
 32
of them by the neck and drew them close together. Dimly they were aware of
Grishnakh's great head and hideous face between them; his foul breath was on their
cheeks. He began to paw them and feel them. Pippin shuddered as hard cold fingers
groped down his back.
 'Well, my little ones!' said Grishnakh in a soft whisper. 'Enjoying your nice rest? Or
not? A little awkwardly placed, perhaps: swords and whips on one side, and nasty
spears on the other! Little people should not meddle in affairs that are too big for
them.' His fingers continued to grope. There was a light like a pale but hot fire behind
his eyes.
 The thought came suddenly into Pippin's mind, as if caught direct from the urgent
thought of his enemy: 'Grishnakh knows about the Ring! He's looking for it, while
Ugluk is busy: he probably wants it for himself.' Cold fear was in Pippin's heart, yet at
the same time he was wondering what use he could make of Grishnakh's desire.
 'I don't think you will find it that way,' he whispered. 'It isn't easy to find.'
 'Find it?' said Grishnakh: his fingers stopped crawling and gripped Pippin's
shoulder. 'Find what? What are you talking about, little one?'
 For a moment Pippin was silent. Then suddenly in the darkness he made a noise
in his throat: gollum, gollum. 'Nothing, my precious,' he added.
 The hobbits felt Grishnakh's fingers twitch. 'O ho!' hissed the goblin softly. 'That's
what he means, is it? O ho! Very ve-ry dangerous, my little ones.'
 'Perhaps,' said Merry, now alert and aware of Pippin's guess. 'Perhaps; and not
only for us. Still you know your own business best. Do you want it, or not? And what
would you give for it?'
 'Do I want it? Do I want it?' said Grishnakh, as if puzzled; but his arms were
trembling. 'What would I give for it? What do you mean?'
 'We mean,' said Pippin, choosing his words carefully, 'that it's no good groping in
the dark. We could save you time and trouble. But you must untie our legs first, or
we'll do nothing, and say nothing.'
 'My dear tender little fools,' hissed Grishnakh, 'everything you have, and everything
you know, will be got out of you in due time: everything! You'll wish there was more
that you could tell to satisfy the Questioner, indeed you will: quite soon. We shan't
hurry the enquiry. Oh dear no! What do you think you've been kept alive for? My
dear little fellows, please believe me when I say that it was not out of kindness: that's
not even one of Ugluk's faults.'
 'I find it quite easy to believe,' said Merry. 'But you haven't got your prey home yet.
And it doesn't seem to be going your way, whatever happens. If we come to
Isengard, it won't be the great Grishnakh that benefits: Saruman will take all that he
can find. If you want anything for yourself, now's the time to do a deal.'
 Grishnakh began to lose his temper. The name of Saruman seemed specially to
enrage him. Time was passing and the disturbance was dying down. Ugluk or the
Isengarders might return at any minute.
 'Have you got it – either of you?' he snarled.
 'Gollum, gollum!' said Pippin.
 'Untie our legs!' said Merry.
 They felt the Orc's arms trembling violently. 'Curse you, you filthy little vermin!' he
hissed. 'Untie your legs? I'll untie every string in your bodies. Do you think I can't
search you to the bones? Search you! I'll cut you both to quivering shreds. I don't
need the help of your legs to get you away – and have you all to myself!'
 Suddenly he seized them. The strength in his long arms and shoulders was
terrifying. He tucked them one under each armpit, and crushed them fiercely to his
 33
sides; a great stifling hand was clapped over each of their mouths. Then he sprang
forward, stooping low. Quickly and silently he went, until he came to the edge of the
knoll. There, choosing a gap between the watchers, he passed like an evil shadow
out into the night, down the slope and away westward towards the river that flowed
out of the forest. In that direction there was a wide open space with only one fire.
 After going a dozen yards he halted, peering and listening. Nothing could be seen
or heard. He crept slowly on, bent almost double. Then he squatted and listened
again. Then he stood up, as if to risk a sudden dash. At that very moment the dark
form of a rider loomed up right in front of him. A horse snorted and reared. A man
called out.
 Grishnakh flung himself on the ground flat, dragging the hobbits under him; then he
drew his sword. No doubt he meant to kill his captives, rather than allow them to
escape or to be rescued; but it was his undoing. The sword rang faintly, and glinted a
little in the light of the fire away to his left. An arrow came whistling out of the gloom:
it was aimed with skill, or guided by fate, and it pierced his right hand. He dropped
the sword and shrieked. There was a quick beat of hoofs, and even as Grishnakh
leaped up and ran, he was ridden down and a spear passed through him. He gave a
hideous shivering cry and lay still.
 The hobbits remained flat on the ground, as Grishnakh had left them. Another
horseman came riding swiftly to his comrade's aid. Whether because of some
special keenness of sight, or because of some other sense, the horse lifted and
sprang lightly over them; but its rider did not see them, lying covered in their elvencloaks, too crushed
for the moment, and too afraid to move.
 At last Merry stirred and whispered softly: 'So far so good: but how are we to avoid
being spitted?'
 The answer came almost immediately. The cries of Grishnakh had roused the
Orcs. From the yells and screeches that came from the knoll the hobbits guessed
that their disappearance had been discovered: Ugluk was probably knocking off a
few more heads. Then suddenly the answering cries of orc-voices came from the
right, outside the circle of watch-fires, from the direction of the forest and the
mountains. Mauhur had apparently arrived and was attacking the besiegers. There
was the sound of galloping horses. The Riders were drawing in their ring close round
the knoll, risking the orc-arrows, so as to prevent any sortie, while a company rode
off to deal with the newcomers. Suddenly Merry and Pippin realized that without
moving they were now outside the circle: there was nothing between them and
escape.
 'Now,' said Merry, 'if only we had our legs and hands free, we might get away. But I
can't touch the knots, and I can't bite them.'
 'No need to try,' said Pippin. 'I was going to tell you: I've managed to free my
hands. These loops are only left for show. You'd better have a bit of lembas first.'
 He slipped the cords off his wrists, and fished out a packet. The cakes were
broken, but good, still in their leaf-wrappings. The hobbits each ate two or three
pieces. The taste brought back to them the memory of fair faces, and laughter, and
wholesome food in quiet days now far away. For a while they ate thoughtfully, sitting
in the dark, heedless of the cries and sounds of battle nearby. Pippin was the first to
come back to the present.
 'We must be off,' he said. 'Half a moment!' Grishnakh's sword was lying close at
hand, but it was too heavy and clumsy for him to use; so he crawled forward, and
finding the body of the goblin he drew from its sheath a long sharp knife. With this he
quickly cut their bonds.
 34
 'Now for it!' he said. 'When we've warmed up a bit, perhaps we shall be able to
stand again, and walk. But in any case we had better start by crawling.'
 They crawled. The turf was deep and yielding, and that helped them: but it seemed
a long slow business. They gave the watch-fire a wide berth, and wormed their way
forward bit by bit, until they came to the edge of the river, gurgling away in the black
shadows under its deep banks. Then they looked back.
 The sounds had died away. Evidently Mauhur and his 'lads' had been killed or
driven off. The Riders had returned to their silent ominous vigil. It would not last very
much longer. Already the night was old. In the East, which had remained unclouded,
the sky was beginning to grow pale.
 'We must get under cover,' said Pippin, 'or we shall be seen. It will not be any
comfort to us, if these riders discover that we are not Orcs after we are dead.' He got
up and stamped his feet. 'Those cords have cut me like wires; but my feet are getting
warm again. I could stagger on now. What about you, Merry?'
 Merry got up. 'Yes,' he said, 'I can manage it. Lembas does put heart into you! A
more wholesome sort of feeling, too, than the heat of that orc-draught. I wonder what
it was made of. Better not to know, I expect. Let's get a drink of water to wash away
the thought of it!'
 'Not here, the banks are too steep,' said Pippin. 'Forward now!'
 They turned and walked side by side slowly along the line of the river. Behind them
the light grew in the East. As they walked they compared notes, talking lightly in
hobbit-fashion of the things that had happened since their capture. No listener would
have guessed from their words that they had suffered cruelly, and been in dire peril,
going without hope towards torment and death; or that even now, as they knew well,
they had little chance of ever finding friend or safety again.
 'You seem to have been doing well, Master Took,' said Merry. 'You will get almost
a chapter in old Bilbo's book, if ever I get a chance to report to him. Good work:
especially guessing that hairy villain's little game, and playing up to him. But I wonder
if anyone will ever pick up your trail and find that brooch. I should hate to lose mine,
but I am afraid yours is gone for good.
 'I shall have to brush up my toes, if I am to get level with you. Indeed Cousin
Brandybuck is going in front now. This is where he comes in. I don't suppose you
have much notion where we are; but I spent my time at Rivendell rather better. We
are walking west along the Entwash. The butt-end of the Misty Mountains is in front,
and Fangorn Forest.'
 Even as he spoke the dark edge of the forest loomed up straight before them.
Night seemed to have taken refuge under its great trees, creeping away from the
coming Dawn.
 'Lead on, Master Brandybuck!' said Pippin. 'Or lead back! We have been warned
against Fangorn. But one so knowing will not have forgotten that.'
 'I have not,' answered Merry; 'but the forest seems better to me, all the same, than
turning back into the middle of a battle.'
 He led the way in under the huge branches of the trees. Old beyond guessing, they
seemed. Great trailing beards of lichen hung from them, blowing and swaying in the
breeze. Out of the shadows the hobbits peeped, gazing back down the slope: little
furtive figures that in the dim light looked like elf-children in the deeps of time peering
out of the Wild Wood in wonder at their first Dawn.
 Far over the Great River, and the Brown Lands, leagues upon grey leagues away,
the Dawn came, red as flame. Loud rang the hunting-horns to greet it. The Riders of
Rohan sprang suddenly to life. Horn answered horn again.
 35
 Merry and Pippin heard, clear in the cold air, the neighing of war-horses, and the
sudden singing of many men. The Sun's limb was lifted, an arc of fire, above the
margin of the world. Then with a great cry the Riders charged from the East; the red
light gleamed on mail and spear. The Orcs yelled and shot all the arrows that
remained to them. The hobbits saw several horsemen fall; but their line held on up
the hill and over it, and wheeled round and charged again. Most of the raiders that
were left alive then broke and fled, this way and that, pursued one by one to the
death. But one band, holding together in a black wedge, drove forward resolutely in
the direction of the forest. Straight up the slope they charged towards the watchers.
Now they were drawing near, and it seemed certain that they would escape: they
had already hewn down three Riders that barred their way.
 'We have watched too long,' said Merry. 'There's Ugluk! I don't want to meet him
again.' The hobbits turned and fled deep into the shadows of the wood.
 So it was that they did not see the last stand, when Ugluk was overtaken and
brought to bay at the very edge of Fangorn. There he was slain at last by Eomer, the
Third Marshal of the Mark, who dismounted and fought him sword to sword. And
over the wide fields the keen-eyed Riders hunted down the few Orcs that had
escaped and still had strength to fly.
 Then when they had laid their fallen comrades in a mound and had sung their
praises, the Riders made a great fire and scattered the ashes of their enemies. So
ended the raid, and no news of it came ever back either to Mordor or to Isengard; but
the smoke of the burning rose high to heaven and was seen by many watchful eyes.
Chapter 4
Treebeard
 Meanwhile the hobbits went with as much speed as the dark and tangled forest
allowed, following the line of the running stream, westward and up towards the
slopes of the mountains, deeper and deeper into Fangorn. Slowly their fear of the
Orcs died away, and their pace slackened. A queer stifling feeling came over them,
as if the air were too thin or too scanty for breathing.
 At last Merry halted. 'We can't go on like this,' he panted. 'I want some air.'
 'Let's have a drink at any rate,' said Pippin. 'I'm parched.' He clambered on to a
 36
great tree-root that wound down into the stream, and stooping drew up some water
in his cupped hands. It was clear and cold, and he took many draughts. Merry
followed him. The water refreshed them and seemed to cheer their hearts; for a
while they sat together on the brink of the stream, dabbling their sore feet and legs,
and peering round at the trees that stood silently about them, rank upon rank, until
they faded away into grey twilight in every direction.
 'I suppose you haven't lost us already?' said Pippin, leaning back against a great
tree-trunk. 'We can at least follow the course of this stream, the Entwash or whatever
you call it, and get out again the way we came.'
 'We could, if our legs would do it,' said Merry; 'and if we could breathe properly.'
 'Yes, it is all very dim, and stuffy, in here,' said Pippin. 'It reminds me, somehow, of
the old room in the Great Place of the Tooks away back in the Smials at
Tuckborough: a huge place, where the furniture has never been moved or changed
for generations. They say the Old Took lived in it year after year, while he and the
room got older and shabbier together – and it has never changed since he died, a
century ago. And Old Gerontius was my great-great-grandfather: that puts it back a
bit. But that is nothing to the old feeling of this wood. Look at all those weeping,
trailing, beards and whiskers of lichen! And most of the trees seem to be half
covered with ragged dry leaves that have never fallen. Untidy. I can't imagine what
spring would look like here, if it ever comes; still less a spring-cleaning.'
 'But the Sun at any rate must peep in sometimes.' said Merry. 'It does not look or
feel at all like Bilbo's description of Mirkwood. That was all dark and black, and the
home of dark black things. This is just dim, and frightfully tree-ish. You can't imagine
animals living here at all, or staying for long.'
 'No, nor hobbits,' said Pippin. 'And I don't like the thought of trying to get through it
either. Nothing to eat for a hundred miles, I should guess. How are our supplies?'
 'Low,' said Merry. 'We ran off with nothing but a couple of spare packets of lembas,
and left everything else behind.' They looked at what remained of the elven-cakes:
broken fragments for about five meagre days, that was all. 'And not a wrap or a
blanket,' said Merry. 'We shall be cold tonight, whichever way we go.'
 'Well, we'd better decide on the way now,' said Pippin. 'The morning must be
getting on.'
 Just then they became aware of a yellow light that had appeared, some way
further on into the wood: shafts of sunlight seemed suddenly to have pierced the
forest-roof.
 'Hullo!' said Merry. 'The Sun must have run into a cloud while we've been under
these trees, and now she has run out again; or else she has climbed high enough to
look down through some opening. It isn't far – let's go and investigate!'
 They found it was further than they thought. The ground was rising steeply still,
and it was becoming increasingly stony. The light grew broader as they went on, and
soon they saw that there was a rock-wall before them: the side of a hill, or the abrupt
end of some long root thrust out by the distant mountains. No trees grew on it, and
the sun was falling full on its stony face. The twigs of the trees at its foot were
stretched out stiff and still, as if reaching out to the warmth. Where all had looked so
shabby and grey before, the wood now gleamed with rich browns, and with the
smooth black-greys of bark like polished leather. The boles of the trees glowed with
a soft green like young grass: early spring or a fleeting vision of it was about them.
 In the face of the stony wall there was something like a stair: natural perhaps, and
made by the weathering and splitting of the rock, for it was rough and uneven. High
up, almost level with the tops of forest-trees, there was a shelf under a cliff. Nothing
 37
grew there but a few grasses and weeds at its edge, and one old stump of a tree
with only two bent branches left: it looked almost like the figure of some gnarled old
man, standing there, blinking in the morning-light.
 'Up we go!' said Merry joyfully. 'Now for a breath of air, and a sight of the land!'
 They climbed and scrambled up the rock. If the stair had been made it was for
bigger feet and longer legs than theirs. They were too eager to be surprised at the
remarkable way in which the cuts and sores of their captivity had healed and their
vigour had returned. They came at length to the edge of the shelf almost at the feet
of the old stump; then they sprang up and turned round with their backs to the hill,
breathing deep, and looking out eastward. They saw that they had only come some
three or four miles into the forest: the heads of the trees marched down the slopes
towards the plain. There, near the fringe of the forest, tall spires of curling black
smoke went up, wavering and floating towards them.
 'The wind's changing,' said Merry. 'It's turned east again. It feels cool up here.'
 'Yes,' said Pippin. 'I'm afraid this is only a passing gleam, and it will all go grey
again. What a pity! This shaggy old forest looked so different in the sunlight. I almost
felt I liked the place.'
 'Almost felt you liked the Forest! That's good! That's uncommonly kind of you,' said
a strange voice. 'Turn round and let me have a look at your faces. I almost feel that I
dislike you both, but do not let us be hasty. Turn round!' A large knob-knuckled hand
was laid on each of their shoulders, and they were twisted round, gently but
irresistibly; then two great arms lifted them up.
 They found that they were looking at a most extraordinary face. It belonged to a
large Man-like, almost Troll-like, figure, at least fourteen foot high, very sturdy, with a
tall head, and hardly any neck. Whether it was clad in stuff like green and grey bark,
or whether that was its hide, was difficult to say. At any rate the arms, at a short
distance from the trunk, were not wrinkled, but covered with a brown smooth skin.
The large feet had seven toes each. The lower part of the long face was covered
with a sweeping grey beard, bushy, almost twiggy at the roots, thin and mossy at the
ends. But at the moment the hobbits noted little but the eyes. These deep eyes were
now surveying them, slow and solemn, but very penetrating. They were brown, shot
with a green light. Often afterwards Pippin tried to describe his first impression of
them.
 'One felt as if there was an enormous well behind them, filled up with ages of
memory and long, slow, steady thinking; but their surface was sparkling with the
present: like sun shimmering on the outer leaves of a vast tree, or on the ripples of a
very deep lake. I don't know but it felt as if something that grew in the ground –
asleep, you might say, or just feeling itself as something between roof-tip and leaftip, between deep
earth and sky had suddenly waked up, and was considering you
with the same slow care that it had given to its own inside affairs for endless years.'
 38
 'Hrum, Hoom,' murmured the voice, a deep voice like a very deep woodwind
instrument. 'Very odd indeed! Do not be hasty, that is my motto. But if I had seen
you, before I heard your voices – I liked them: nice little voices; they reminded me of
something I cannot remember – if I had seen you before I heard you, I should have
just trodden on you, taking you for little Orcs, and found out my mistake afterwards.
Very odd you are, indeed. Root and twig, very odd!'
 Pippin, though still amazed, no longer felt afraid. Under those eyes he felt a
curious suspense, but not fear. 'Please,' he said, 'who are you? And what are you?'
 A queer look came into the old eyes, a kind of wariness; the deep wells were
covered over. 'Hrum, now,' answered the voice; 'well, I am an Ent, or that's what they
call me. Yes, Ent is the word. The Ent, I am, you might say, in your manner of
speaking. Fangorn is my name according to some, Treebeard others make it.
Treebeard will do.'
 'An Ent?' said Merry. 'What's that? But what do you call yourself? What's your real
name?'
 'Hoo now!' replied Treebeard. 'Hoo! Now that would be telling! Not so hasty. And I
am doing the asking. You are in my country. What are you, I wonder? I cannot place
you. You do not seem to come in the old lists that I learned when I was young. But
that was a long, long time ago, and they may have made new lists. Let me see! Let
me see! How did it go?
Learn now the lore of Living Creatures!
First name the four, the free peoples:
Eldest of all, the elf-children;
Dwarf the delver, dark are his houses;
Ent the earthborn, old as mountains;
Man the mortal, master of horses.
 Hm, hm, hm.
Beaver the builder, buck the leaper,
Bear bee-hunter, boar the fighter;
 39
Hound is hungry, hare is fearful…
 hm, hm.
Eagle in eyrie, ox in pasture,
Hart horn-crowned; hawk is swiftest
Swan the whitest, serpent coldest…
 Hoom, hm; hoom, hm, how did it go? Room tum, room tum, roomty toom tum. It
was a long list. But anyway you do not seem to fit in anywhere!'
 'We always seem to have got left out of the old lists, and the old stories,' said
Merry. 'Yet we've been about for quite a long time. We're hobbits.'
 'Why not make a new line?' said Pippin.
'Half-grown hobbits, the hole-dwellers.'
 Put us in amongst the four, next to Man (the Big People) and you've got it.'
 'Hm! Not bad, not bad,' said Treebeard. 'That would do. So you live in holes, eh? It
sounds very right and proper. Who calls you hobbits, though? That does not sound
elvish to me. Elves made all the old words: they began it.'
 'Nobody else calls us hobbits; we call ourselves that,' said Pippin.
 'Hoom, hmm! Come now! Not so hasty! You call yourselves hobbits? But you
should not go telling just anybody. You'll be letting out your own right names if you're
not careful.'
 'We aren't careful about that,' said Merry. 'As a matter of fact I'm a Brandybuck,
Meriadoc Brandybuck, though most people call me just Merry.'
 'And I'm a Took, Peregrin Took, but I'm generally called Pippin, or even Pip.'
 'Hm, but you are hasty folk, I see,' said Treebeard. 'I am honoured by your
confidence; but you should not be too free all at once. There are Ents and Ents, you
know; or there are Ents and things that look like Ents but ain't, as you might say. I'll
call you Merry and Pippin if you please – nice names. For I am not going to tell you
my name, not yet at any rate.' A queer half-knowing, half-humorous look came with a
green flicker into his eyes. 'For one thing it would take a long while: my name is
growing all the time, and I've lived a very long, long time; so my name is like a story.
Real names tell you the story of the things they belong to in my language, in the Old
Entish as you might say. It is a lovely language, but it takes a very long time to say
anything in it, because we do not say anything in it, unless it is worth taking a long
time to say, and to listen to.
 'But now,' and the eyes became very bright and 'present', seeming to grow smaller
and almost sharp, 'what is going on? What are you doing in it all? I can see and hear
(and smell and feel) a great deal from this, from this, from this
a-lalla-lalla-rumbakamanda-lind-or-burume. Excuse me: that is a part of my name for it; I do not know
what the word is in the outside languages: you know, the thing we are on, where I
stand and look out on fine mornings, and think about the Sun, and the grass beyond
the wood, and the horses, and the clouds, and the unfolding of the world. What is
going on? What is Gandalf up to? And these – burarum,' he made a deep rumbling
noise like a discord on a great organ – 'these Orcs, and young Saruman down at
Isengard? I like news. But not too quick now.'
 'There is quite a lot going on,' said Merry: 'and even if we tried to be quick, it would
take a long time to tell. But you told us not to be hasty. Ought we to tell you anything
 40
so soon? Would you think it rude, if we asked what you are going to do with us, and
which side you are on? And did you know Gandalf?'
 'Yes, I do know him: the only wizard that really cares about trees,' said Treebeard.
'Do you know him?'
 'Yes,' said Pippin sadly, 'we did. He was a great friend, and he was our guide.'
 'Then I can answer your other questions,' said Treebeard. 'I am not going to do
anything with you: not if you mean by that 'do something to you' without your leave.
We might do some things together. I don't know about sides. I go my own way; but
your way may go along with mine for a while. But you speak of Master Gandalf, as if
he was in a story that had come to an end.'
 'Yes, we do,' said Pippin sadly. 'The story seems to be going on, but I am afraid
Gandalf has fallen out of it.'
 'Hoo, come now!' said Treebeard. 'Hoom, hm, ah well.' He paused, looking long at
the hobbits. 'Hoom, ah, well I do not know what to say. Come now!'
 'If you would like to hear more. said Merry, 'we will tell you. But it will take some
time. Wouldn't you like to put us down? Couldn't we sit here together in the sun,
while it lasts? You must be getting tired of holding us up.'
 'Hm, tired? No. I am not tired. I do not easily get tired. And I do not sit down. I am
not very, hm, bendable. But there, the Sun is going in. Let us leave this – did you say
what you call it?'
 'Hill?' suggested Pippin. 'Shelf? Step?' suggested Merry.
 Treebeard repeated the words thoughtfully. 'Hill. Yes, that was it. But it is a hasty
word for a thing that has stood here ever since this part of the world was shaped.
Never mind. Let us leave it, and go.'
 'Where shall we go?' asked Merry.
 'To my home, or one of my homes,' answered Treebeard.
 'Is it far?'
 'I do not know. You might call it far, perhaps. But what does that matter?'
 'Well, you see, we have lost all our belongings,' said Merry. 'We have only a little
food.'
 'O! Hm! You need not trouble about that,' said Treebeard. 'I can give you a drink
that will keep you green and growing for a long, long while. And if we decide to part
company, I can set you down outside my country at any point you choose. Let us go!'
 Holding the hobbits gently but firmly, one in the crook of each arm, Treebeard lifted
up first one large foot and then the other, and moved them to the edge of the shelf.
The rootlike toes grasped the rocks. Then carefully and solemnly, he stalked down
from step to step, and reached the floor of the Forest.
 At once he set off with long deliberate strides through the trees, deeper and deeper
into the wood, never far from the stream, climbing steadily up towards the slopes of
the mountains. Many of the trees seemed asleep, or as unaware of him as of any
other creature that merely passed by; but some quivered, and some raised up their
branches above his head as he approached. All the while, as he walked, he talked to
himself in a long running stream of musical sounds.
 The hobbits were silent for some time. They felt, oddly enough, safe and
comfortable, and they had a great deal to think and wonder about. At last Pippin
ventured to speak again.
 'Please, Treebeard,' he said, 'could I ask you something? Why did Celeborn warn
us against your forest? He told us not to risk getting entangled in it.'
 'Hmm, did he now?' rumbled Treebeard. 'And I might have said much the same, if
you had been going the other way. Do not risk getting entangled in the woods of
 41
Laurelindorenan! That is what the Elves used to call it, but now they make the name
shorter: Lothlorien they call it. Perhaps they are right: maybe it is fading; not growing.
Land of the Valley of Singing Gold, that was it, once upon a time. Now it is the
Dreamflower. Ah well! But it is a queer place, and not for just any one to venture in. I
am surprised that you ever got out, but much more surprised that you ever got in:
that has not happened to strangers for many a year. It is a queer land.
 'And so is this. Folk have come to grief here. Aye, they have, to grief.
Laurelindorenan lindelorendor malinornelion ornemalin,' he hummed to himself.
'They are falling rather behind the world in there, I guess,' he said 'Neither this
country, nor anything else outside the Golden Wood, is what it was when Celeborn
was young. Still:
Taurelilomea-tumbalemorna Tumbaletaurea Lomeanor, 1
 that is what they used to say. Things have changed, but it is still true in places.'
 'What do you mean?' said Pippin. 'What is true?'
 'The trees and the Ents,' said Treebeard. 'I do not understand all that goes on
myself, so I cannot explain it to you. Some of us are still true Ents, and lively enough
in our fashion, but many are growing sleepy, going tree-ish, as you might say. Most
of the trees are just trees, of course; but many are half awake. Some are quite wide
awake, and a few are, well, ah, well getting Entish. That is going on all the time.
 'When that happens to a tree, you find that some have bad hearts. Nothing to do
with their wood: I do not mean that. Why, I knew some good old willows down the
Entwash, gone long ago, alas! They were quite hollow, indeed they were falling all to
pieces, but as quiet and sweet-spoken as a young leaf. And then there are some
trees in the valleys under the mountains, sound as a bell, and bad right through. That
sort of thing seems to spread. There used to be some very dangerous parts in this
country. There are still some very black patches.'
 'Like the Old Forest away to the north, do you mean?' asked Merry.
 'Aye, aye, something like, but much worse. I do not doubt there is some shadow of
the Great Darkness lying there still away north; and bad memories are handed down.
But there are hollow dales in this land where the Darkness has never been lifted, and
the trees are older than I am. Still, we do what we can. We keep off strangers and
the foolhardy; and we train and we teach, we walk and we weed.
 'We are tree-herds, we old Ents. Few enough of us are left now. Sheep get like
shepherd, and shepherds like sheep, it is said; but slowly, and neither have long in
the world. It is quicker and closer with trees and Ents, and they walk down the ages
together. For Ents are more like Elves: less interested in themselves than Men are,
and better at getting inside other things. And yet again Ents are more like Men, more
changeable than Elves are, and quicker at taking the colour of the outside, you might
say. Or better than both: for they are steadier and keep their minds on things longer.
'Some of my kin look just like trees now, and need something great to rouse them;
and they speak only in whispers. But some of my trees are limb-lithe, and many can
talk to me. Elves began it, of course, waking trees up and teaching them to speak
and learning their tree-talk. They always wished to talk to everything, the old Elves
did. But then the Great Darkness came, and they passed away over the Sea, or fled
into far valleys, and hid themselves, and made songs about days that would never
come again. Never again. Aye, aye, there was all one wood once upon a time: from
here to the Mountains of Lune, and this was just the East End.
 'Those were the broad days! Time was when I could walk and sing all day and hear
 42
no more than the echo of my own voice in the hollow hills. The woods were like the
woods of Lothlorien, only thicker stronger, younger. And the smell of the air! I used to
spend a week just breathing.'
 Treebeard fell silent, striding along, and yet making hardly a sound with his great
feet. Then he began to hum again, and passed into a murmuring chant. Gradually
the hobbits became aware that he was chanting to them:
In the willow-meads of Tasarinan I walked in the Spring.
Ah! the sight and the smell of the Spring in Nan-tasarion!
And I said that was good.
I wandered in Summer in the elm-woods of Ossiriand.
Ah! the light and the music in the Summer by the Seven Rivers of Ossir!
And I thought that was best.
To the beeches of Neldoreth I came in the Autumn.
Ah! the gold and the red and the sighing of leaves in the Autumn in Taur-na-neldor!
It was more than my desire.
To the pine-trees upon the highland of Dorthonion I climbed in the Winter.
Ah! the wind and the whiteness and the black branches of Winter upon Orod-naThon!
My voice went up and sang in the sky.
And now all those lands lie under the wave.
And I walk in Ambarona, in Tauremorna, in Aldalome.
In my own land, in the country of Fangorn,
Where the roots are long,
And the years lie thicker than the leaves
In Tauremornalome.
 He ended, and strode on silently, and in all the wood, as far as ear could reach,
there was not a sound.
 The day waned, and dusk was twined about the boles of the trees. At last the
hobbits saw, rising dimly before them, a steep dark land: they had come to the feet
of the mountains, and to the green roots of tall Methedras. Down the hillside the
young Entwash, leaping from its springs high above, ran noisily from step to step to
meet them. On the right of the stream there was a long slope, clad with grass, now
grey in the twilight. No trees grew there and it was open to the sky; stars were
shining already in lakes between shores of cloud.
 Treebeard strode up the slope, hardly slackening his pace. Suddenly before them
the hobbits saw a wide opening. Two great trees stood there, one on either side, like
living gate-posts; but there was no gate save their crossing and interwoven boughs.
As the old Ent approached, the trees lifted up their branches, and all their leaves
quivered and rustled. For they were evergreen trees, and their leaves were dark and
polished, and gleamed in the twilight. Beyond them was a wide level space, as
though the floor of a great hall had been cut in the side of the hill. On either hand the
walls sloped upwards, until they were fifty feet high or more, and along each wall
stood an aisle of trees that also increased in height as they marched inwards.
 At the far end the rock-wall was sheer, but at the bottom it had been hollowed back
into a shallow bay with an arched roof: the only roof of the hall, save the branches of
the trees, which at the inner end overshadowed all the ground leaving only a broad
open path in the middle. A little stream escaped from the springs above, and leaving
the main water, fell tinkling down the sheer face of the wall, pouring in silver drops,
 43
like a fine curtain in front of the arched bay. The water was gathered again into a
stone basin in the floor between the trees, and thence it spilled and flowed away
beside the open path, out to rejoin the Entwash in its journey through the forest.
 'Hm! Here we are!' said Treebeard, breaking his long silence. 'I have brought you
about seventy thousand ent-strides, but what that comes to in the measurement of
your land I do not know. Anyhow we are near the roots of the Last Mountain. Part of
the name of this place might be Wellinghall, if it were turned into your language. I like
it. We will stay here tonight.' He set them down on the grass between the aisles of
the trees, and they followed him towards the great arch. The hobbits now noticed
that as he walked his knees hardly bent, but his legs opened in a great stride. He
planted his big toes (and they were indeed big, and very broad) on the ground first,
before any other part of his feet.
 For a moment Treebeard stood under the rain of the falling spring, and took a deep
breath; then he laughed, and passed inside. A great stone table stood there, but no
chairs. At the back of the bay it was already quite dark. Treebeard lifted two great
vessels and stood them on the table. They seemed to be filled with water; but he
held his hands over them, and immediately they began to glow, one with a golden
and the other with a rich green light; and the blending of the two lights lit the bay; as
if the sun of summer was shining through a roof of young leaves. Looking back, the
hobbits saw that the trees in the court had also begun to glow, faintly at first, but
steadily quickening, until every leaf was edged with light: some green, some gold,
some red as copper; while the tree-trunks looked like pillars moulded out of luminous
stone.
 'Well, well, now we can talk again,' said Treebeard. 'You are thirsty I expect.
Perhaps you are also tired. Drink this!' He went to the back of the bay, and then they
saw that several tall stone jars stood there, with heavy lids. He removed one of the
lids, and dipped in a great ladle, and with it filled three bowls, one very large bowl,
and two smaller ones.
 'This is an ent-house,' he said, 'and there are no seats, I fear. But you may sit on
the table.' Picking up the hobbits he set them on the great stone slab, six feet above
the ground, and there they sat dangling their legs, and drinking in sips.
 The drink was like water, indeed very like the taste of the draughts they had drunk
from the Entwash near, the borders of the forest, and yet there was some scent or
savour in it which they could not describe: it was faint, but it reminded them of the
smell of a distant wood borne from afar by a cool breeze at night. The effect of the
draught began at the toes, and rose steadily through every limb, bringing
refreshment and vigour as it coursed upwards, right to the tips of the hair. Indeed the
hobbits felt that the hair on their heads was actually standing up, waving and curling
and growing. As for Treebeard, he first laved his feet in the basin beyond the arch,
and then he drained his bowl at one draught, one long, slow draught. The hobbits
thought he would never stop.
 At last he set the bowl down again. 'Ah – ah,' he sighed. 'Hm, hoom, now we can
talk easier. You can sit on the floor, and I will lie down; that will prevent this drink
from rising to my head and sending me to sleep.'
 On the right side of the bay there was a great bed on low legs; not more than a
couple of feet high, covered deep in dried grass and bracken. Treebeard lowered
himself slowly on to this (with only the slightest sign of bending at his middle), until
he lay at full length, with his arms behind his head, looking up at the ceiling. upon
which lights were flickering, like the play of leaves in the sunshine. Merry and Pippin
sat beside him on pillows of grass.
 44
 'Now tell me your tale, and do not hurry!' said Treebeard.
 The hobbits began to tell him the story of their adventures ever since they left
Hobbiton. They followed no very clear order, for they interrupted one another
continually, and Treebeard often stopped the speaker, and went back to some earlier
point, or jumped forward asking questions about later events. They said nothing
whatever about the Ring, and did not tell him why they set out or where they were
going to; and he did not ask for any reasons.
 He was immensely interested in everything: in the Black Riders, in Elrond, and
Rivendell, in the Old Forest, and Tom Bombadil, in the Mines of Moria, and in
Lothlorien and Galadriel. He made them describe the Shire and its country over and
over again. He said an odd thing at this point. 'You never see any, hm, any Ents
round there do you?' he asked. 'Well, not Ents, Entwives I should really say.'
 'Entwives?' said Pippin. 'Are they like you at all?'
 'Yes, hm, well no: I do not really know now,' said Treebeard thoughtfully. 'But they
would like your country, so I just wondered.'
 Treebeard was however especially interested in everything that concerned
Gandalf; and most interested of all in Saruman's doings. The hobbits regretted very
much that they knew so little about them: only a rather vague report by Sam of what
Gandalf had told the Council. But they were clear at any rate that Ugluk and his troop
came from Isengard, and spoke of Saruman as their master.
 'Hm, hoom!' said Treebeard, when at last their story had wound and wandered
down to the battle of the Orcs and the Riders of Rohan. 'Well, well! That is a bundle
of news and no mistake. You have not told me all, no indeed, not by a long way. But
I do not doubt that you are doing as Gandalf would wish. There is something very big
going on, that I can see, and what it is maybe I shall learn in good time, or in bad
time. By root and twig, but it is a strange business: up sprout a little folk that are not
in the old lists, and behold the Nine forgotten Riders reappear to hunt them, and
Gandalf takes them on a great journey, and Galadriel harbours them in Caras
Galadhon, and Orcs pursue them down all the leagues of Wilderland: indeed they
seem to be caught up in a great storm. I hope they weather it!'
 'And what about yourself?' asked Merry.
 'Hoom, hm, I have not troubled about the Great Wars,' said Treebeard, 'they mostly
concern Elves and Men. That is the business of Wizards: Wizards are always
troubled about the future. I do not like worrying about the future. I am not altogether
on anybody's side, because nobody is altogether on my side, if you understand me:
nobody cares for the woods as I care for them, not even Elves nowadays. Still, I take
more kindly to Elves than to others: it was the Elves that cured us of dumbness long
ago, and that was a great gift that cannot be forgotten, though our ways have parted
since. And there are some things, of course, whose side I am altogether not on; I am
against them altogether: these – burarum' (he again made a deep rumble of disgust)
'– these Orcs, and their masters.
 'I used to be anxious when the shadow lay on Mirkwood, but when it removed to
Mordor, I did not trouble for a while: Mordor is a long way away. But it seems that the
wind is setting East, and the withering of all woods may be drawing near. There is
naught that an old Ent can do to hold back that storm: he must weather it or crack.
 'But Saruman now! Saruman is a neighbour: I cannot overlook him. I must do
something, I suppose. I have often wondered lately what I should do about
Saruman.'
 'Who is Saruman?' asked Pippin. 'Do you know anything about his history?'
 'Saruman is a Wizard,' answered Treebeard. 'More than that I cannot say. I do not
 45
know the history of Wizards. They appeared first after the Great Ships came over the
Sea; but if they came with the Ships I never can tell. Saruman was reckoned great
among them, I believe. He gave up wandering about and minding the affairs of Men
and Elves, some time ago – you would call it a very long time ago: and he settled
down at Angrenost, or Isengard as the Men of Rohan call it. He was very quiet to
begin with, but his fame began to grow. He was chosen to be head of the White
Council, they say; but that did not turn out too well. I wonder now if even then
Saruman was not turning to evil ways. But at any rate he used to give no trouble to
his neighbours. I used to talk to him. There was a time when he was always walking
about my woods. He was polite in those days, always asking my leave (at least when
he met me); and always eager to listen. I told him many things that he would never
have found out by himself; but he never repaid me in like kind. I cannot remember
that he ever told me anything. And he got more and more like that; his face, as I
remember it – I have not seen it for many a day – became like windows in a stone
wall: windows with shutters inside.
 'I think that I now understand what he is up to. He is plotting to become a Power.
He has a mind of metal and wheels; and he does not care for growing things, except
as far as they serve him for the moment. And now it is clear that he is a black traitor.
He has taken up with foul folk, with the Orcs. Brm, hoom! Worse than that: he has
been doing something to them; something dangerous. For these Isengarders are
more like wicked Men. It is a mark of evil things that came in the Great Darkness that
they cannot abide the Sun; but Saruman's Orcs can endure it, even if they hate it. I
wonder what he has done? Are they Men he has ruined, or has he blended the races
of Orcs and Men? That would be a black evil!'
 Treebeard rumbled for a moment, as if he were pronouncing some deep,
subterranean Entish malediction. 'Some time ago I began to wonder how Orcs dared
to pass through my woods so freely,' he went on. 'Only lately did I guess that
Saruman was to blame, and that long ago he had been spying out all the ways, and
discovering my secrets. He and his foul folk are making havoc now. Down on the
borders they are felling trees – good trees. Some of the trees they just cut down and
leave to rot – orc-mischief that; but most are hewn up and carried off to feed the fires
of Orthanc. There is always a smoke rising from Isengard these days.
 'Curse him, root and branch! Many of those trees were my friends creatures I had
known from nut and acorn; many had voices of their own that are lost for ever now.
And there are wastes of stump and bramble where once there were singing groves. I
have been idle. I have let things slip. It must stop!'
 Treebeard raised himself from his bed with a jerk, stood up, and thumped his hand
on the table. The vessels of light trembled and sent up two jets of flame. There was a
flicker like green fire in his eyes, and his beard stood out stiff as a great besom.
 'I will stop it!' he boomed. 'And you shall come with me. You may be able to help
me. You will be helping your own friends that way, too; for if Saruman is not checked
Rohan and Gondor will have an enemy behind as well as in front. Our roads go
together – to Isengard!'
 'We will come with you,' said Merry. 'We will do what we can.'
 'Yes!' said Pippin. 'I should like to see the White Hand overthrown. I should like to
be there, even if I could not be of much use: I shall never forget Ugluk and the
crossing of Rohan.'
 'Good! Good!' said Treebeard. 'But I spoke hastily. We must not be hasty. I have
become too hot. I must cool myself and think; fur it is easier to shout stop! than to do
it.'
 46
 He strode to the archway and stood for some time under the falling rain of the
spring. Then he laughed and shook himself, and wherever the drops of water fell
glittering from him to the ground they glinted like red and green sparks. He came
back and laid himself on the bed again and was silent.
 After some time the hobbits heard him murmuring again. He seemed to be
counting on his fingers. 'Fangorn, Finglas, Fladrif, aye, aye,' he sighed. 'The trouble
is that there are so few of us left,' he said turning towards the hobbits. 'Only three
remain of the first Ents that walked in the woods before the Darkness: only myself,
Fangorn, and Finglas and Fladrif – to give them their Elvish names; you may call
them Leaflock and Skinbark if you like that better. And of us three Leaflock and
Skinbark are not much use for this business. Leaflock has grown sleepy, almost treeish, you might say: he
has taken to standing by himself half-asleep all through the
summer with the deep grass of the meadows round his knees. Covered with leafy
hair he is. He used to rouse up in winter; but of late he has been too drowsy to walk
far even then. Skinbark lived on the mountain-slopes west of Isengard. That is where
the worst trouble has been. He was wounded by the Orcs, and many of his folk and
his tree-herds have been murdered and destroyed. He has gone up into the high
places, among the birches that he loves best, and he will not come down. Still, I
daresay I could get together a fair company of our younger folks – if I could make
them understand the need; if I could rouse them: we are not a hasty folk. What a pity
there are so few of us!'
 'Why are there so few when you have lived in this country so long?' asked Pippin.
'Have a great many died?'
 'Oh, no!' said Treebeard. 'None have died from inside, as you might say. Some
have fallen in the evil chances of the long years, of course: and more have grown
tree-ish. But there were never many of us and we have not increased. There have
been no Entings – no children, you would say, not for a terrible long count of years.
You see, we lost the Entwives.'
 'How very sad!' said Pippin. 'How was it that they all died?'
 'They did not die!' said Treebeard. 'I never said died. We lost them, I said. We lost
them and we cannot find them.' He sighed. 'I thought most folk knew that. There
were songs about the hunt of the Ents for the Entwives sung among Elves and Men
from Mirkwood to Gondor. They cannot be quite forgotten.'
 'Well, I am afraid the songs have not come west over the Mountains to the Shire,'
said Merry. 'Won't you tell us some more, or sing us one of the songs?'
 'Yes, I will indeed,' said Treebeard, seeming pleased with the request. 'But I cannot
tell it properly, only in short; and then we must end our talk: tomorrow we have
councils to call, and work to do, and maybe a journey to begin.'
 'It is rather a strange and sad story,' he went on after a pause. 'When the world
was young, and the woods were wide and wild, the Ents and the Entwives – and
there were Entmaidens then: ah! the loveliness of Fimbrethil, of Wandlimb the
lightfooted, in the days of our youth! – they walked together and they housed
together. But our hearts did not go on growing in the same way: the Ents gave their
love to things that they met in the world, and the Entwives gave their thought to other
things, for the Ents loved the great trees; and the wild woods, and the slopes of the
high hills; and they drank of the mountain-streams, and ate only such fruit as the
trees let fall in their path; and they learned of the Elves and spoke with the Trees.
But the Entwives gave their minds to the lesser trees, and to the meads in the
sunshine beyond the feet of the forests; and they saw the sloe in the thicket, and the
wild apple and the cherry blossoming in spring, and the green herbs in the
 47
waterlands in summer, and the seeding grasses in the autumn fields. They did not
desire to speak with these things; but they wished them to hear and obey what was
said to them. The Entwives ordered them to grow according to their wishes, and bear
leaf and fruit to their liking; for the Entwives desired order, and plenty, and peace (by
which they meant that things should remain where they had set them). So the
Entwives made gardens to live in. But we Ents went on wandering, and we only
came to the gardens now and again. Then when the Darkness came in the North,
the Entwives crossed the Great River, and made new gardens, and tilled new fields,
and we saw them more seldom. After the Darkness was overthrown the land of the
Entwives blossomed richly, and their fields were full of corn. Many men learned the
crafts of the Entwives and honoured them greatly; but we were only a legend to
them, a secret in the heart of the forest. Yet here we still are, while all the gardens of
the Entwives are wasted: Men call them the Brown Lands now.
 'I remember it was long ago – in the time of the war between Sauron and the Men
of the Sea – desire came over me to see Fimbrethil again. Very fair she was still in
my eyes, when I had last seen her, though little like the Entmaiden of old. For the
Entwives were bent and browned by their labour; their hair parched by the sun to the
hue of ripe corn and their cheeks like red apples. Yet their eyes were still the eyes of
our own people. We crossed over Anduin and came to their land: but we found a
desert: it was all burned and uprooted, for war had passed over it. But the Entwives
were not there. Long we called, and long we searched; and we asked all folk that we
met which way the Entwives had gone. Some said they had never seen them; and
some said that they had seen them walking away west, and some said east, and
others south. But nowhere that we went could we find them. Our sorrow was very
great. Yet the wild wood called, and we returned to it. For many years we used to go
out every now and again and look for the Entwives, walking far and wide and calling
them by their beautiful names. But as time passed we went more seldom and
wandered less far. And now the Entwives are only a memory for us, and our beards
are long and grey. The Elves made many songs concerning the Search of the Ents,
and some of the songs passed into the tongues of Men. But we made no songs
about it, being content to chant their beautiful names when we thought of the
Entwives. We believe that we may meet again in a time to come, and perhaps we
shall find somewhere a land where we can live together and both be content. But it is
foreboded that that will only be when we have both lost all that we now have. And it
may well be that that time is drawing near at last. For if Sauron of old destroyed the
gardens, the Enemy today seems likely to wither all the woods.
 'There was an Elvish song that spoke of this, or at least so I understand it. It used
to be sung up and down the Great River. It was never an Entish song, mark you: it
would have been a very long song in Entish! But we know it by heart, and hum it now
and again. This is how it runs in your tongue:
 Ent.
When Spring unfolds the beechen leaf, and sap is in the bough;
When light is on the wild-wood stream, and wind is on the brow;
When stride is long, and breath is deep, and keen the mountain-air,
Come back to me! Come back to me, and say my land is fair!
 Entwife.
 48
When Spring is come to garth and field, and corn is in the blade;
When blossom like a shining snow is on the orchard laid;
When shower and Sun upon the Earth with fragrance fill the air,
I'll linger here, and will not come, because my land is fair.
 Ent.
When Summer lies upon the world, and in a noon of gold
Beneath the roof of sleeping leaves the dreams of trees unfold;
When woodland halls are green and cool, and wind is in the West,
Come back to me! Come back to me, and say my land is best!
 Entwife.
When Summer warms the hanging fruit and burns the berry brown;
When straw is gold, and ear is white, and harvest comes to town;
When honey spills, and apple swells, though wind be in the West,
I'll linger here beneath the Sun, because my land is best!
 Ent.
When Winter comes, the winter wild that hill and wood shall slay;
When trees shall fall and starless night devour the sunless day;
When wind is in the deadly East, then in the bitter rain
I'll look for thee, and call to thee; I'll come to thee again!
 Entwife.
When Winter comes, and singing ends; when darkness falls at last;
When broken is the barren bough, and light and labour past;
I'll look for thee, and wait for thee, until we meet again:
Together we will take the road beneath the bitter rain!
 Both.
Together we will take the road that leads into the West,
And far away will find a land where both our hearts may rest.
 Treebeard ended his song. 'That is how it goes,' he said. 'It is Elvish, of course:
lighthearted, quickworded, and soon over. I daresay it is fair enough. But the Ents
could say more on their side, if they had time! But now I am going to stand up and
take a little sleep. Where will you stand?'
 'We usually lie down to sleep,' said Merry. 'We shall be all right where we are.'
 'Lie down to sleep!' said Treebeard. 'Why of course you do! Hm, hoom; I was
forgetting: singing that song put me in mind of old times; almost thought that I was
talking to young Entings, I did. Well, you can lie on the bed. I am going to stand in
the rain. Good night!'
 Merry and Pippin climbed on to the bed and curled up in the soft grass and fern. It
was fresh, and sweet-scented, and warm. The lights died down, and the glow of the
 49
trees faded; but outside under the arch they could see old Treebeard standing,
motionless, with his arms raised above his head. The bright stars peered out of the
sky, and lit the falling water as it spilled on to his fingers and head, and dripped,
dripped, in hundreds of silver drops on to his feet. Listening to the tinkling of the
drops the hobbits fell asleep.
 They woke to find a cool sun shining into the great court, and on to the floor of the
bay. Shreds of high cloud were overhead, running on a stiff easterly wind. Treebeard
was not to be seen; but while Merry and Pippin were bathing in the basin by the
arch, they heard him humming and singing, as he came up the path between the
trees.
 'Hoo, ho! Good morning, Merry and Pippin!' he boomed, when he saw them. 'You
sleep long. I have been many a hundred strides already today. Now we will have a
drink, and go to Entmoot.'
 He poured them out two full bowls from a stone jar; but from a different jar. The
taste was not the same as it had been the night before: it was earthier and richer,
more sustaining and food-like, so to speak. While the hobbits drank, sitting on the
edge of the bed, and nibbling small pieces of elf-cake (more because they felt that
eating was a necessary part of breakfast than because they felt hungry), Treebeard
stood, humming in Entish or Elvish or some strange tongue, and looking up at the
sky.
 'Where is Entmoot?' Pippin ventured to ask.
 'Hoo, eh? Entmoot?' said Treebeard, turning round. 'It is not a place, it is a
gathering of Ents – which does not often happen nowadays. But I have managed to
make a fair number promise to come. We shall meet in the place where we have
always met: Derndingle Men call it. It is away south from here. We must be there
before noon.'
 Before long they set off. Treebeard carried the hobbits in his arms as on the
previous day. At the entrance to the court he turned to the right, stepped over the
stream, and strode away southwards along the feet of great tumbled slopes where
trees were scanty. Above these the hobbits saw thickets of birch and rowan, and
beyond them dark climbing pinewoods. Soon Treebeard turned a little away from the
hills and plunged into deep groves, where the trees were larger, taller, and thicker
than any that the hobbits had ever seen before. For a while they felt faintly the sense
of stifling which they had noticed when they first ventured into Fangorn, but it soon
passed. Treebeard did not talk to them. He hummed to himself deeply and
thoughtfully, but Merry and Pippin caught no proper words: it sounded like boom,
boom, rumboom, boorar, boom, boom, dahrar boom boom, dahrar boom, and so on
with a constant change of note and rhythm. Now and again they thought they heard
an answer, a hum or a quiver of sound, that seemed to come out of the earth, or
from boughs above their heads, or perhaps from the boles of the trees; but
Treebeard did not stop or turn his head to either side.
 They had been going for a long while – Pippin had tried to keep count of the 'entstrides' but had failed,
getting lost at about three thousand – when Treebeard began
to slacken his pace. Suddenly he stopped, put the hobbits down, and raised his
curled hands to his mouth so that they made a hollow tube; then he blew or called
through them. A great hoom, hom rang out like a deep-throated horn in the woods,
and seemed to echo from the trees. Far off there came from several directions a
similar hoom, hom, hoom that was not an echo but an answer.
 Treebeard now perched Merry and Pippin on his shoulders and strode on again,
every now and then sending out another horn-call, and each time the answers came
 50
louder and nearer. In this way they came at last to what looked like an impenetrable
wall of dark evergreen trees, trees of a kind that the hobbits had never seen before:
they branched out right from the roots, and were densely clad in dark glossy leaves
like thornless holly, and they bore many stiff upright flower-spikes with large shining
olive-coloured buds.
 Turning to the left and skirting this huge hedge Treebeard came in a few strides to
a narrow entrance. Through it a worn path passed and dived suddenly down a long
steep slope. The hobbits saw that they were descending into a great dingle, almost
as round as a bowl, very wide and deep, crowned at the rim with the high dark
evergreen hedge. It was smooth and grassclad inside, and there were no trees
except three very tall and beautiful silver-birches that stood at the bottom of the bowl.
Two other paths led down into the dingle: from the west and from the east.
 Several Ents had already arrived. More were coming in down the other paths, and
some were now following Treebeard. As they drew near the hobbits gazed at them.
They had expected to see a number of creatures as much like Treebeard as one
hobbit is like another (at any rate to a stranger's eye); and they were very much
surprised to see nothing of the kind. The Ents were as different from one another as
trees from trees: some as different as one tree is from another of the same name but
quite different growth and history; and some as different as one tree-kind from
another, as birch from beech; oak from fir. There were a few older Ents, bearded and
gnarled like hale but ancient trees (though none looked as ancient as Treebeard);
and there were tall strong Ents, clean-limbed and smooth-skinned like forest-trees in
their prime; but there were no young Ents, no saplings. Altogether there were about
two dozen standing on the wide grassy floor of the dingle, and as many more were
marching in.
 At first Merry and Pippin were struck chiefly by the variety that they saw: the many
shapes, and colours, the differences in girth; and height, and length of leg and arm;
and in the number of toes and fingers (anything from three to nine). A few seemed
more or less related to Treebeard, and reminded them of beech-trees or oaks. But
there were other kinds. Some recalled the chestnut: brown-skinned Ents with large
splayfingered hands, and short thick legs. Some recalled the ash: tall straight grey
Ents with many-fingered hands and long legs; some the fir (the tallest Ents), and
others the birch, the rowan, and the linden. But when the Ents all gathered round
Treebeard, bowing their heads slightly, murmuring in their slow musical voices, and
looking long and intently at the strangers, then the hobbits saw that they were all of
the same kindred, and all had the same eyes: not all so old or so deep as
Treebeard's, but all with the same slow, steady, thoughtful expression, and the same
green flicker.
 As soon as the whole company was assembled, standing in a wide circle round
Treebeard, a curious and unintelligible conversation began. The Ents began to
murmur slowly: first one joined and then another, until they were all chanting
together in a long rising and falling rhythm, now louder on one side of the ring, now
dying away there and rising to a great boom on the other side. Though he could not
catch or understand any of the words – he supposed the language was Entish –
Pippin found the sound very pleasant to listen to at first; but gradually his attention
wavered. After a long time (and the chant showed no signs of slackening) he found
himself wondering, since Entish was such an 'unhasty' language, whether they had
yet got further than Good Morning; and if Treebeard was to call the roll, how many
days it would take to sing all their names. 'I wonder what the Entish is for yes or no,'
he thought. He yawned.
 51
 Treebeard was immediately aware of him. 'Hm, ha, hey, my Pippin!' he said, and
the other Ents all stopped their chant. 'You are a hasty folk, I was forgetting; and
anyway it is wearisome listening to a speech you do not understand. You may get
down now. I have told your names to the Entmoot, and they have seen you, and they
have agreed that you are not Orcs, and that a new line shall be put in the old lists.
We have got no further yet, but that is quick work for an Entmoot. You and Merry can
stroll about in the dingle, if you like. There is a well of good water, if you need
refreshing, away yonder in the north bank. There are still some words to speak
before the Moot really begins. I will come and see you again, and tell you how things
are going.'
 He put the hobbits down. Before they walked away, they bowed low. This feat
seemed to amuse the Ents very much, to judge by the tone of their murmurs, and the
flicker of their eyes; but they soon turned back to their own business. Merry and
Pippin climbed up the path that came in from the west, and looked through the
opening in the great hedge. Long tree-clad slopes rose from the lip of the dingle, and
away beyond them, above the fir-trees of the furthest ridge there rose, sharp and
white, the peak of a high mountain. Southwards to their left they could see the forest
falling away down into the grey distance. There far away there was a pale green
glimmer that Merry guessed to be a glimpse of the plains of Rohan.
 'I wonder where Isengard is?' said Pippin.
 'I don't know quite where we are,' said Merry; 'but that peak is probably Methedras,
and as far as I can remember the ring of Isengard lies in a fork or deep cleft at the
end of the mountains. It is probably down behind this great ridge. There seems to be
a smoke or haze over there, left of the peak, don't you think?'
 'What is Isengard like?' said Pippin. 'I wonder what Ents can do about it anyway.'
 'So do I,' said Merry. 'Isengard is a sort of ring of rocks or hills, I think, with a flat
space inside and an island or pillar of rock in the middle, called Orthanc. Saruman
has a tower on it. There is a gate, perhaps more than one, in the encircling wall, and
I believe there is a stream running through it; it comes out of the mountains, and
flows on across the Gap of Rohan. It does not seem the sort of place for Ents to
tackle. But I have an odd feeling about these Ents: somehow I don't think they are
quite as safe and, well, funny as they seem. They seem slow, queer, and patient,
almost sad; and yet I believe they could be roused. If that happened, I would rather
not be on the other side.'
 'Yes!' said Pippin. 'I know what you mean. There might be all the difference
between an old cow sitting and thoughtfully chewing, and a bull charging; and the
change might come suddenly. I wonder if Treebeard will rouse them. I am sure he
means to try. But they don't like being roused. Treebeard got roused himself last
night, and then bottled it up again.'
 The hobbits turned back. The voices of the Ents were still rising and falling in their
conclave. The sun had now risen high enough to look over the high hedge: it
gleamed on the tops of the birches and lit the northward side of the dingle with a cool
yellow light. There they saw a little glittering fountain. They walked along the rim of
the great bowl at the feet of the evergreens – it was pleasant to feel cool grass about
their toes again, and not to be in a hurry – and then they climbed down to the
gushing water. They drank a little, a clean, cold, sharp draught, and sat down on a
mossy stone, watching the patches of sun on the grass and the shadows of the
sailing clouds passing over the floor of the dingle. The murmur of the Ents went on. It
seemed a very strange and remote place, outside their world, and far from
everything that had ever happened to them. A great longing came over them for the
 52
faces and voices of their companions, especially for Frodo and Sam, and for Strider.
 At last there came a pause in the Ent-voices; and looking up they saw Treebeard
coming towards them. with another Ent at his side.
 'Hm, hoom, here I am again,' said Treebeard. 'Are you getting weary, or feeling
impatient, hmm, eh? Well, I am afraid that you must not get impatient yet. We have
finished the first stage now; but I have still got to explain things again to those that
live a long way off, far from Isengard, and those that I could not get round to before
the Moot, and after that we shall have to decide what to do. However, deciding what
to do does not take Ents so long as going over all the facts and events that they
have to make up their minds about. Still, it is no use denying, we shall be here a long
time yet: a couple of days very likely. So I have brought you a companion. He has an
ent-house nearby. Bregalad is his Elvish name. He says he has already made up his
mind and does not need to remain at the Moot. Hm, hm, he is the nearest thing
among us to a hasty Ent. You ought to get on together. Good-bye!' Treebeard turned
and left them.
 Bregalad stood for some time surveying the hobbits solemnly; and they looked at
him, wondering when he would show any signs of 'hastiness'. He was tall, and
seemed to be one of the younger Ents; he had smooth shining skin on his arms and
legs; his lips were ruddy, and his hair was grey-green. He could bend and sway like
a slender tree in the wind. At last he spoke, and his voice though resonant was
higher and clearer than Treebeard's.
 'Ha, hmm, my friends, let us go for a walk!' he said. 'I am Bregalad, that is
Quickbeam in your language. But it is only a nickname, of course. They have called
me that ever since I said yes to an elder Ent before he had finished his question.
Also I drink quickly, and go out while some are still wetting their beards. Come with
me!'
 He reached down two shapely arms and gave a long-fingered hand to each of the
hobbits. All that day they walked about in the woods with him, singing, and laughing;
for Quickbeam often laughed. He laughed if the sun came out from behind a cloud,
he laughed if they came upon a stream or spring: then he stooped and splashed his
feet and head with water; he laughed sometimes at some sound or whisper in the
trees. Whenever he saw a rowan-tree he halted a while with his arms stretched out,
and sang, and swayed as he sang.
 At nightfall he brought them to his ent-house: nothing more than a mossy stone set
upon turves under a green bank. Rowan-trees grew in a circle about it, and there
was water (as in all ent-houses), a spring bubbling out from the bank. They talked for
a while as darkness fell on the forest. Not far away the voices of the Entmoot could
be heard still going on; but now they seemed deeper and less leisurely, and every
now and again one great voice would rise in a high and quickening music, while all
the others died away. But beside them Bregalad spoke gently in their own tongue,
almost whispering; and they learned that he belonged to Skinbark's people, and the
country where they had lived had been ravaged. That seemed to the hobbits quite
enough to explain his 'hastiness', at least in the matter of Orcs.
 'There were rowan-trees in my home,' said Bregalad, softly and sadly, 'rowan-trees
that took root when I was an Enting, many many years ago in the quiet of the world.
The oldest were planted by the Ents to try and please the Entwives; but they looked
at them and smiled and said that they knew where whiter blossom and richer fruit
were growing. Yet there are no trees of all that race, the people of the Rose, that are
so beautiful to me. And these trees grew and grew, till the shadow of each was like a
green hall, and their red berries in the autumn were a burden, and a beauty and a
 53
wonder. Birds used to flock there. I like birds, even when they chatter; and the rowan
has enough and to spare. But the birds became unfriendly and greedy and tore at
the trees, and threw the fruit down and did not eat it. Then Orcs came with axes and
cut down my trees. I came and called them by their long names, but they did not
quiver, they did not hear or answer: they lay dead.
O Orofarne, Lassemista, Carnimirie!
O rowan fair, upon your hair how white the blossom lay!
O rowan mine, I saw you shine upon a summer's day,
Your rind so bright, your leaves so light, your voice so cool and soft;
Upon your head how golden-red the crown you bore aloft!
O rowan dead, upon your head your hair is dry and grey;
Your crown is spilled, your voice is stilled for ever and a day.
O Orofarne, Lassemista, Carnimirie!
 The hobbits fell asleep to the sound of the soft singing of Bregalad, that seemed to
lament in many tongues the fall of trees that he had loved.
 The next day they spent also in his company, but they did not go far from his
'house'. Most of the time they sat silent under the shelter of the bank; for the wind
was colder, and the clouds closer and greyer; there was little sunshine, and in the
distance the voices of the Ents at the Moot still rose and fell, sometimes loud and
strong, sometimes low and sad, sometimes quickening, sometimes slow and solemn
as a dirge. A second night came and still the Ents held conclave under hurrying
clouds and fitful stars.
 The third day broke, bleak and windy. At sunrise the Ents' voices rose to a great
clamour and then died down again. As the morning wore on the wind fell and the air
grew heavy with expectancy. The hobbits could see that Bregalad was now listening
intently, although to them, down in the dell of his ent-house, the sound of the Moot
was faint.
 The afternoon came, and the sun, going west towards the mountains, sent out long
yellow beams between the cracks and fissures of the clouds. Suddenly they were
aware that everything was very quiet; the whole forest stood in listening silence. Of
course, the Ent-voices had stopped. What did that mean? Bregalad was standing up
erect and tense, looking back northwards towards Derndingle.
 Then with a crash came a great ringing shout: ra-hoom-rah! The trees quivered
and bent as if a gust had struck them. There was another pause, and then a
marching music began like solemn drums, and above the rolling beats and booms
there welled voices singing high and strong.
We come, we come with roll of drum: ta-runda runda runda rom!
 The Ents were coming: ever nearer and louder rose their song:
We come, we come with horn and drum: ta-runa runa runa rom!
 Bregalad picked up the hobbits and strode from his house.
 Before long they saw the marching line approaching: the Ents were swinging along
with great strides down the slope towards them. Treebeard was at their head, and
some fifty followers were behind him, two abreast, keeping step with their feet and
beating time with their hands upon their flanks. As they drew near the flash and
 54
flicker of their eyes could be seen.
 'Hoom, hom! Here we come with a boom, here we come at last!' called Treebeard
when he caught sight of Bregalad and the hobbits. 'Come, join the Moot! We are off.
We are off to Isengard!'
 'To Isengard!' the Ents cried in many voices.
 'To Isengard!'
To Isengard! Though Isengard be ringed and barred with doors of stone;
Though Isengard be strong and hard, as cold as stone and bare as bone,
We go, we go, we go to war, to hew the stone and break the door;
For bole and bough are burning now, the furnace roars – we go to war!
To land of gloom with tramp of doom, with roll of drum, we come, we come;
To Isengard with doom we come!
With doom we come, with doom we come!
 So they sang as they marched southwards.
 Bregalad, his eyes shining, swung into the line beside Treebeard. The old Ent now
took the hobbits back, and set them on his shoulders again, and so they rode
proudly at the head of the singing company with beating hearts and heads held high.
Though they had expected something to happen eventually, they were amazed at
the change that had come over the Ents. It seemed now as sudden as the bursting
of a flood that had long been held back by a dike.
 'The Ents made up their minds rather quickly, after all, didn't they?' Pippin ventured
to say after some time, when for a moment the singing paused, and only the beating
of hands and feet was heard.
 'Quickly?' said Treebeard. 'Hoom! Yes, indeed. Quicker than I expected. Indeed I
have not seen them roused like this for many an age. We Ents do not like being
roused; and we never are roused unless it is clear to us that our trees and our lives
are in great danger. That has not happened in this Forest since the wars of Sauron
and the Men of the Sea. It is the orc-work, the wanton hewing – rarum – without
even the bad excuse of feeding the fires, that has so angered us; and the treachery
of a neighbour, who should have helped us. Wizards ought to know better: they do
know better. There is no curse in Elvish, Entish, or the tongues of Men bad enough
for such treachery. Down with Saruman!'
 'Will you really break the doors of Isengard?' asked Merry.
 'Ho, hm, well, we could, you know! You do not know, perhaps, how strong we are.
Maybe you have heard of Trolls? They are mighty strong. But Trolls are only
counterfeits, made by the Enemy in the Great Darkness, in mockery of Ents, as Orcs
were of Elves. We are stronger than Trolls. We are made of the bones of the earth.
We can split stone like the roots of trees, only quicker, far quicker, if our minds are
roused! If we are not hewn down, or destroyed by fire or blast of sorcery, we could
split Isengard into splinters and crack its walls into rubble.'
 'But Saruman will try to stop you, won't he?'
 'Hm, ah, yes, that is so. I have not forgotten it. Indeed I have thought long about it.
But, you see, many of the Ents are younger than I am, by many lives of trees. They
are all roused now, and their mind is all on one thing: breaking Isengard. But they will
start thinking again before long; they will cool down a little, when we take our
evening drink. What a thirst we shall have! But let them march now and sing! We
have a long way to go, and there is time ahead for thought. It is something to have
started.'
 55
 Treebeard marched on, singing with the others for a while. But after a time his
voice died to a murmur and fell silent again. Pippin could see that his old brow was
wrinkled and knotted. At last he looked up, and Pippin could see a sad look in his
eyes, sad but not unhappy. There was a light in them, as if the green flame had sunk
deeper into the dark wells of his thought.
 'Of course, it is likely enough, my friends,' he said slowly, 'likely enough that we are
going to our doom: the last march of the Ents. But if we stayed at home and did
nothing, doom would find us anyway, sooner or later. That thought has long been
growing in our hearts; and that is why we are marching now. It was not a hasty
resolve. Now at least the last march of the Ents may be worth a song. Aye,' he
sighed, 'we may help the other peoples before we pass away. Still, I should have
liked to see the songs come true about the Entwives. I should dearly have liked to
see Fimbrethil again. But there, my friends, songs like trees bear fruit only in their
own time and their own way: and sometimes they are withered untimely.'
 The Ents went striding on at a great pace. They had descended into a long fold of
the land that fell away southward; now they began to climb up, and up, on to the high
western ridge. The woods fell away and they came to scattered groups of birch, and
then to bare slopes where only a few gaunt pine-trees grew. The sun sank behind
the dark hill-back in front. Grey dusk fell.
 Pippin looked behind. The number of the Ents had grown – or what was
happening? Where the dim bare slopes that they had crossed should lie, he thought
he saw groves of trees. But they were moving! Could it be that the trees of Fangorn
were awake, and the forest was rising, marching over the hills to war? He rubbed his
eyes wondering if sleep and shadow had deceived him; but the great grey shapes
moved steadily onward. There was a noise like wind in many branches. The Ents
were drawing near the crest of the ridge now, and all song had ceased. Night fell,
and there was silence: nothing was to be heard save a faint quiver of the earth
beneath the feet of the Ents, and a rustle, the shade of a whisper as of many drifting
leaves. At last they stood upon the summit, and looked down into a dark pit: the
great cleft at the end of the mountains: Nan Curunir, the Valley of Saruman.
 'Night lies over Isengard,' said Treebeard. 
